~ Guy Davenport, Geography of the Imagination
Mardin
How has the Holy Spirit developed your passion for Christ?
You might ask now: why in all the world is she complaining about this? Other kids would have been happy their parents had taken them for a family trip to the mountains. Well. GREAT!! I would have loved to be “another kid” at these specific days… and spending time with my parents in every case was great and would have been even greater when going waterskiing, surfing, swimming, horseback riding or something like this…
Before you begin frosting your cupcakes, first you have to make a cut out of his mouth, this is where the cookie will go when you are done frosting him. With a small knife cut out a semi circle, just a little bit bigger than the miniature chocolate chip cookie.
For peace and for love: my faith stands.
im still on my diet of around 26 weekly miles of the 'faster stuff' and no long runs. i guess the plan for the year will be more about intensity and less about distance..it'll be interesting to see how it goes. im really quite giddy about it all
So without further ado, please take a moment to read through this session and take from it the light that is Christina.
Photoshopping.
So, the USDA has decided to let the poultry plants self-regulate. There's a good plan! That will save money! Of course if you stop doing your job then it costs less to run your agency. You've got to love that kind of thinking... I guess we could save money on the police force if the cops tell us to do our own policing! We're going to start saving money on groceries in our house too, because we're going to stop eating! OK, that won't work... you eat today, and I'll eat tomorrow, and we'll cut the bill in half!
I rarely let the word "No" escape
To Nietzsche, the predominance of religious faith in society is a testament to the extent slave morality has permeated into the consciousness of humankind. The widespread adherence to Christianity, in particular, demonstrates for Nietzsche the depravity the individual has allowed his self-respect to flounder: “that the crowd adored a god—and that the ‘god’ was merely a poor sacrificial animal.”[7] A man who willingly calls himself a sheep, and whose greatest wish is to escape this life so his actions and thoughts can be guided and watched over by an eternal shepherd, is to Nietzsche a man who has already married the shackles others have sought fit to place on him. Not only that, it is the Christian deity itself which exhibits the greatest propensity for the slave morality, as its method of saving his weak flock was to slavishly submit his life to the will of those he knew were his inferiors; an unforgivable move in Nietzsche’s eyes. Whereas many see Jesus’ sacrifice as an admirable and selfless act, Nietzsche sees in it something sinister:
Where do I keep superlative grayness jewelry?
These press lists are also one way you build up your personal press lists. When someone contacts you (in return or on their own) to set up an interview or ask about what you’re promoting, especially if you’re going to be reaching out about this particular product/person/event/company more than once, ask if they would like to be added to your press list for future updates and news. It’s like networking, really, just with a very specific purpose. Track who you’re adding to this list by keeping their names & where they work listed as well as their emails and/or phone numbers.
Just close enough to touch
He also had two children with Deborah:
“Because he never came home. Where did he go to live then?” Legitimate question coming from the skinny girl on the other side of the table.
Doyle scoffed, holding his ground. “You aren’t really serious, aren’t you?”
Céline: Did the candles help?
Drop me an e-mail at namlaitaisuan@gmail.com if you need any clarification or further information. Better yet, if you’d like to place an order to give our products a try.
The unusual cheerleader in question was a humble squirrel who found its way on to Sahlen's Stadium and terrorised Philadelphia's keeper Nicole Barnhart with a strange circle dance that took over the penalty area. For eight minutes the little critter had a ball as it evaded ground staff, but eventually it was trapped in a cardboard box and removed from the ground after its moment in the spotlight.
Some of you are tired, you're battle weary...wishing, waiting for that breakthrough. Wanting your marriage to be like hers, and hers and his.
I have no idea, but I think I’ll keep going with tying my hair back. If its good enough for Steven Seagal, its good enough for me.
So, what do you think? Do you have warm memories of this (white) "masterpiece," or not-so-warm memories? If you have read it, do you think your race had anything to do with your reaction to it?
3. Bake the granola for 40 minutes or until lightly browned, stirring every 10 minutes to keep the mixture from sticking. Let it cool completely, and then stir in the cranberries or dried fruit. Makes about 7 cups.
Caroline! Air headed cheerleader/vampire who is becoming more awesome as the show progresses.
Abu Usama, spokesperson for the group Islam4Ireland, told Metro Éireann that “it is against the rule of Islam for a Muslim woman to be seen publicly without her hijab”.
Watching, Swede said, "Forgive me running, Rube?"
Chia, Y., and Chiu, J. (1994). Groundwater monitoring for deep-well injection. Report no. ANL/ES/PP–73641. NTIS order no. DE94019291. Argonne National Laboratory, IL.
4. I have killer allergies – mostly outdoor, but a few indoor ones make life fun, too
I can't wait to see what you've all been working on this week. Before you link up though, please take a look at the guidelines:
B: So I took blah-blahs word for it at this time. I thought just having a friend couldn't be no crime. Cause I have friends and that's a fact, like agnes, agatha, jermaine, and jack.
My ovens are full...
I mean, I could actually write about it, but it would absolutely be novel-like, and it would take me a lot of time to write it.
Here are mine so far. If you have children, please tell them to avert their eyes now. According to my search terms, this is not a fambly blog.
Murray Fisher, founder of the New York Harbor School said, “We need an army of talented, skilled, interested students to help restore a degraded ecosystem.”
He rocks in the tree tops all day long
Mary had always loved the way the lilacs blossomed in the Spring. The scent filled her room when she left the windows open at night and gave her such nice dreams. That fake, lotiony smell wasn't the same. It never lifted her out of the dumpy trailer and into a fairy castle like the real thing did.
and put out some seed
It was getting dark and colder. I knew it was time to go back to my nice hotel and get ready for a night on the town!
Cheryl
Bayley thinks that Mayzie hung the moon. From her, Bayley has learned much more about what is expected of a good dog in this household than I could have ever taught her. On the other hand, Mayzie has also taught Bayley that the vacuum cleaner is a fearsome fire breathing dragon, and to hide in a corner whenever it starts to roar.
13. What do you want to be in 10 years? bestseller
There's a compulsive need to make certain your child isn't missing out on anything, and let's face it, it doesn't get any bigger than Christmas. From lights on houses, to friendly customer service people, and of course TV galore, Christmas is everywhere, and your child could easily feel left out.
A unique and eye catching perfume bottle – curved with a marron glace copper lace corset for a luxurious wrap.
I broke my left wrist Sunday afternoon playing football with friends. We play kickball when we can, and try to get a bit of pigskin in as well. Unfortunately, I took a spill returning a kick - my momentum got the best of me, or I slipped on the transition from grass to dirt, whichever sounds manlier - and the result is my first broken bone since the fifth grade.
Merpel wonders if Jordan will be able to achieve his desired slam dunk in this case. She notes that Yao Ming and Yi Jianlian were both Chinese, which may have influenced the court's decision. Indeed, she recalls, foreign companies have, for whatever reason, had difficulty in enforcing intellectual property rights in China. See KatPosts on Apple and IKEA: here, here, here and here.
On the down side, we had to rise before the sun and get a lot done in one day… This turns into a 16 hour day without a real break. All in all, the day was a success. We made a good amount of sales, picked up some custom orders, handed out tons of business cards, met some wonderful people and did I mention the guacamole???? Divine.
c) richer or poorer? RICHER!! Hubby is working again!!
I used Sarah's Teal, Pumpkin & Black inks to create this journal page:
- A few bites of Spinach Dip
casting a golden glow on the beautiful ornate bed
And today. Monday. Missing my baby. Feeling sad. Feeling the mixture of crazy-making feelings of being pregnant now, when I never “planned” to be… the hope and fear of all of that, tied into the holiday season and missing Acacia. I was thinking how I wished I had some kind of pause button. One where I could take a break. Not sure what that would look like exactly… but maybe a place where Acacia is with me, whole and complete. A place where this new baby is too. And my friends and family, including each of you, and I’m happy; we’re all happy. Sigh… what would that be like? Happy. Huh. Not that I don’t have moments of happiness now, but I don’t feel like it’s my general demeanor anymore.
Terrorism is not new. There undoubtedly will be more terrorist attacks, either from Al-Qaeda or others, just as there were before 2001. Terrorists might strike Monday. There will always be homicidal zealots like Mohamed Atta or Timothy McVeigh, and some of them will succeed, terribly. But this is not a new era. The terrorist threat is still small. It’s the terrorism industry that got big.
Essentially Idea Transform aims to support people with bright ideas that use technology to benefit society in general – whether in the fields of healthcare, education, environment or the community.
While commercial and residential property prices in the three cities have peaked over the years, the revaluation came over a certain period of time. Factors that have led to higher prices are their favourable geographic locations, a secure legal framework and an inflow of wealth from both domestic and foreign investors, as well as a large banking sector that offers loans against property.
So now on to the contest! Here are the rules:
- the feeling of cold
The year is 2017. In a world where harsh divisions and economic strife have pulled the United States apart, Stacey Martin, Kate Wilson, and the Washington Freedom Force find themselves on the front line protecting the, now, free city of Washington D.C. and the American Reconciliation Summit- an attempt to reunite the fifty states into one country once again.
Last year, on this very day, I had different wishes. I wished I could sleep all night, not woken by nightmares, or shame, or a constant refrain of guilt and shame. I wished I didn't have thoughts of wanting to die. I never wished to kill myself, just to die a quick painless death in my sleep so I could stop having so much pain and stop causing so much pain. I wished for friends that didn't abandon me in my worst moment. I wished to understand why they abandoned me, what it was about me that pushed people away. I wished for energy. I wished to see my body as a source of strength rather than limit and weakness. I wished for love--to give it and receive it wholly. I wished I had an answer. I wished to laugh until my cheeks hurt. I wished I had a community in real life, not just virtual. I wished I could be a better mother and wife. I wished I wouldn't drink when I didn't want to drink. I wished that alcohol wasn't the first thing I thought of in the morning and the last thing I thought of at night. I wished for peace, serenity, and calm. I wished to be of some use in the world.
When Tammy’s daughter started dressing as a girl for the first time at the age of 16 on her walk to school, people would shout from their cars: “Girl with a cock!”, “Tranny!” and “Man-beast!”. “At her school they were shocked but they were wonderful,” remembers Tammy. “It was explained to all the year groups that it was a condition and not a choice. They explained the effect it had on her and that bullying would not be tolerated. The kids were great. It was the parents saying they didn’t want a freak in school with their child.”
But Andre, you’re not Jose
Here are just a few of the pictures we had taken by Miles and Me Photography. They did an awesome job.
Vincent Pastore, demon slayer!
As there is a limit only within which property ownership is effective, so is there a limit only within which the human mind is effective and at least possibly beneficent. We must assume that the limit would vary somewhat, though not greatly, with the abilities of persons. Beyond that limit the mind loses its wholeness, and its faculties begin to be employed separately or fragmented according to the specialties or professions for which it has been trained.
I’ll stop here as I don’t want to write too much, but will just say there is a great deal more to both films than this, above all the humour - and also they both have wonderful supporting casts. I especially enjoyed Dame Sybil Thorndike’s performance in The Prince and the Showgirl, and Dame Judi Dench playing Dame Sybil in My Week with Marilyn, as well as Zoe Wanamaker as Monroe’s Method acting coach, Paula Strasberg.
Jaxon is hanging out in my ribs right now as I type this. Halfway laying down/slouching on the couch probably isn't the most comfortable for him so I bet he's trying to get me to change positions.
In an update posted on his Facebook, Mr Baey wrote:
Oh, I must add that the kids (ages 3 and 13) enjoyed them too!
The head dude of the entire group in our area was once an Israeli Army soldier, seriously. He was inflexible, anal retentive & often hated me intensely. His son was in my troop. I tried to follow the rules, but never succeeded to his expectations. Our lack of military precision nearly brought him to tears. He was a good guy, working with total idiots.
Exasperation kicks in. In best Homer Simpson mode I’m thinking to myself, ‘Money can be exchanged for goods and services’. Yeah, right. Holding out the money for a bit longer doesn’t work and people further down the line, such as it is, are getting impatient with the stupid foreigner who thinks money has a role to play in economic exchanges. Defeated, I leave the store. Cheeseless. Grumpy.
I started my brewing career as a homebrewer. I fell in love with the creative art, and eventually the science, of brewing by experimenting with grains and hops and many other things 5 gallons at a time in the comfortable confines of my home. Brew days to me were exciting days of no boundaries freedom. I could put whatever I wanted in a pot and cook it all up. The worst thing that would happen is- I would make beer.
Inside Art: Keith Page
a few other favourites are:
The whole purpose of the Church is to lead all to holiness in Christ, so that death and hell will no longer reign over the earth.
And I to him: “Poet, I thee entreat,
Please make sure you take a moment to visit our Design Team blogs. You can do this by clicking on their photos. Thanks!
On one level, I wasn’t surprised to hear that. I knew, cognitively, that she had that kind of personality. But emotionally? I hadn’t really believed it. It caught me off guard to hear she was that big a problem in the Wards, as well.
Logan says: “Maybe we are staying the night?!” I hope he is joking…!!!
It has been deeply humbling to receive gifts, large and small, from all sorts of quarters. Receiving such gifts brings a responsibility not only to be accountable, but to ask and keep asking hard questions about how best a finite resource can be used within the kingdom of God. To not fall into a trap of appealing for money just to keep the status quo going. The act of asking for money has to go with a transparent willingness to be cross-examined and questioned by those who may well see more clearly than those in the organisation doing the asking who could be suffering from ‘institutional myopia’
In the end, all of the stakeholders are connected. Here’s hoping that the comics that get the attention are the ones that are the funniest. Cheers
Unless, of course, you allow for the space
a lockdown in their own homes.
No sooner had we complained about the hens when my husband spotted one sitting down in our granary. “That’s strange,” he said, “is she sitting on eggs right there?” As we approached the hen, she stood up — and six or so chicks scattered from beneath her. What a pleasant surprise!
in my satin wedding gown
Our couple leave together and once again are lost in their thoughts. They both wait for the bus but only Yi Gak gets on it, with Park Ha opting to walk home. I love how all these dramas make Seoul look very safe at night.
September 9 – October 14, 2006
Processor:-
The birds song softens into playful chirps appropriate for happy wake up time.
Another year went by! This is the first time ever that I am writing my blog while sitting in my laboratory. It turns out, the experiment is such that I am bored waiting for the computation to end. But, anyways, I am here to tell you about another amazing year for my blog. On February 5, Coffee - Blog - Love - Hangout turned 6! How cool is that? In this last year, there are many things I have reflected upon in my writings. Aah, I wished I had written more, but, you know, how this works. Right now I am in a more relaxed state of mind, so let me think of the wonderful moments in the last one year, that I have shared on my blog.
The thought of throwing a house party on my birthday mhmmm 6 more months huh
With as much crap as I give my husband for basically being a man, I clearly don't give him enough credit for the little things. Like, it's forecasted to snow today, and I discovered that before going to work he salted only my side of the uphill driveway so this Florida girl doesn't fly down into the yard across the street.
Who was overwhelmed as it became clear that God wanted her in Uganda, so she told Him that if Uganda was His plan, to bring in the money so she would know? This sister.
But this girl is done…
I just haven't felt like blogging recently. A couple of years ago it was a huge part of my life. While I still have the wonderful friends that I found through my blog, I don't share my daily goings on.
I actually look forward to that.
*Follow your child’s progress thanks to complete score charts in all categories.
These chairs have been with us for almost 6-years. They're comfortable, but huge. The scale has never been good for this room, and while I've known that since we moved them here - there wasn't much I could do to change it without spending money I'd rather spend on something else. Not only do they not work in any other area of my room than where they are right now ... they certainly don't work for the Sally Wheat inspired space.
For my final layer of contrast, I added RV66 to the pinks, and a hint of Opaque white to the highlights on the plastic flamingo. I darkened the contrast on the leaves with G46. I also dotted in a few more spots of color into the ground with YG61 and some more E44.
Fair enough but that type of red Toryism or socially liberal conservatism is hardly in the ascendancy. Your movement has been hijacked by the radicals under your umbrella and they’ve seized Washington, Ottawa and city hall in Toronto. They’re attacking women’s rights. They’re declaring climate change hokum and maybe even beneficial. The federal Conservative government is trying to close down a safe injection site in Vancouver in the face of overwhelming evidence of its positive contribution. At the same time they’re attempting to roll back drug laws to a Draconian state in order to fill the prisons that they are building. These neocons hate government and everything it stands for.
We cycle through arguments of morality versus legality, the scenario of a guy trying to get his life back on track, civil liberties violation opposed to simple embarrassment. This is all laced with an ongoing feud between Andy, Anna and several others.
Rate: US$ 500/day.
But does anybody seriously believe for one minute that Bain would be nearly as successful as it has been under a sound economy with a bare minimum of regulatory interference, no more than necessary. Let's get real here. Our regulatory system has created an atmosphere that is conducive to business failure as it contributes in large to the sluggishness of our economy. I won't venture to say what percentage of business failures are directly attributable to our oppressive regulatory regimes, but I do know that it has to be significant. Common sense tells you that.
For more information about the mobile dental clinic, and to register for treatment, call 01329 827145. You can also be referred through your GP or health visitor.
3 yards of a silverfish colored thin swimsuit material (Well it wasn’t described as such on the website. Why would they?)
Michelle is such an over-achiever that she asked more than one question! :) She also asked these tough questions,
Nafissatou Diallo continues to press her civil case against Strauss-Kahn today, much to his irritation. I cannot believe that a woman employed as a temptress – when the hour of need for her ‘employers’ to embarrass DSK had long since passed – would continue to press charges. She may well still be motivated by money – but if American intelligence was running her, she’d have been paid off long ago….or disappeared. And anyway, I doubt the CIA would employ such a loose cannon.
new homemade composting system. Pallets﻿: they're FREE & they're everywhere.
Sunday: Skidneæg/Sennepsæg (Eggs in Mustard Sauce from Denmark)
“We’re a little more aggressive this year,” Esquinca said. “(and) a lot more technical.”
and its not so black feathers
Michael Inoa OAK O 20
the song and I thought 'who'd be nice to play guitar?'. We
Baked Oysters Rockefeller ($19) spinach, bacon, cream, parmesan This one is a classic, well executed. Even for someone who is really a purist with their oysters, I thought this was nicely done - I've seen so many places overdo it on the cheese so it ends up overwhelming the oyster, and/or overcooking the spinach so that it's a sloppy mess atop the oyster - but Chaya's is just right in terms of balancing all ingredients.
Here's your chance to organize these listings and create a plan of attack for the future. Do you have yarn in your stash for some of the projects, do you want to attack those first? Are these patterns organized by type - socks, sweaters, scarves, etc?
If you are pregnant, then one thing is sure you will need some kind of maternity service, and it will be the duty of your local healthcare commissioners to make sure you can access it safely. Those commissioner will be required to make sure that the maternity services offered are safe, adequately staffed and that those staff are appropriately qualified to fulfill their role. Maternity Matters gave us a role in promoting choice and in making sure that those choices were available and that people were assisted in making those choices. When though does choice become a want or a demand? When does choice and the way it is exercised by the few mean that those who are more able to move, more affluent, more able to make choices have a detrimental impact on the many?
* When up into March/April (typical during bull markets) the market had a tendency to bottom 1-5 months later. Peaks in March/April in bull markets often weren’t surpassed again for 5-10 months. Examples include 2004, 2006, 2010, and 2011. The later the signal the better. For instance, if there was a bottom in February/March and a top in April, the top in April tends to be a better barometer to focus on.
O’Rourke wants to totally rebuild his property after previously being granted permission for a front and back extension.
Mimi Bord, 46, who runs Mi-mi-for-Me Yoga, a tidy and serene studio in Jackson Heights that is one of the neighborhood’s only yoga centers, has had to make similar allowances. “If there is a little chanting going on, right away this is a turn- off” for some of the Muslims who sign up for her sessions, she said. “Often they won’t come back.”
This has been a concern for me for a long time. It's always there under the surface. For some time I thought I had defeated it. But recently I read a book with tips for writing fantasy where the author made the argument that if you are taking names from history and mythology and not making up your own names for your fantasy world, then you are a hack. And thus all the old insecurities reared their ugly heads and yelled, "We're baaack!"
On the way down to Tacna, we brought a bag of mandarinas to snack on, and about two litres of water. Both were ill advised. The bus was super air-conditioned and extremely dry, and two litres of water was not enough for both of us. We were rationing out the last bottle in tiny sips toward the end of the trip, and when we got to Tacna we were peeing orange. I knew it would not be permitted to cross the border with the mandarinas, but since the bus didn’t cross the border, I figured those would be OK. No such luck. Somewhere south of Ica, we made a stop where everyone got out, with their luggage and had their bags x-rayed and IDs checked at a little building on the higway. They confiscated our last two mandarinas. Apparently, fruit flies are a big deal, and certain provinces won’t tolerate even the possibility of having them inadvertently imported.
I remember the old blocks in the picture. I remember the panic after taking a wrong turn and suddenly driving through the area. And I remember the scepticism when I first went to view what is now my home.
Friday, 09 December 2011
ME: I drove you to Twindy's house so you could sleep over?
In case you don't remember Bruce, the last thing you told Dad was "I have been standing up in Canoes all my life Jack" right before we went over.
I know I owe y'all a post about what the Writing Life actually looks like in reality (following up on an earlier post) but I'm going to bump that post to next week because there's something else that's been occupying my mind.
For flights from the West Coast, you’ll need to upgrade to ultra-long-range aircraft like the Gulfstream V or G550, the Falcon 7X or the Bombardier Global Express/5000. Super-mid-size jets like the XOJET Citation X and XOJET Challenger 300 will need to make a fuel stop (usually in Iceland, Canada or Maine) when flying to and from Europe. Watch this blog for an upcoming in-depth comparison of these aircraft.
It seems we have had a lot of friends having babies recently, and its more fun and personal
Her smile was weak, but warm. "Good thinking. Whatever it was you did."
I loved and adored?
From Midway Island to Hawaii, from Hawaii to California, then MIT and back again. During this journey, he explored live ammunition fields, fell for surfing, set numerous energy world records, and developed amazing projects here at UC San Diego. Byron’s incredible life experiences, game-changing accomplishments, and deep insights create a story you MUST hear!
The Michigan Supreme Court has named Donald Miller, a retired Macomb County circuit court judge, to hear evidence of misconduct charges filed by the Judicial Tenure Commission against Wayne County Circuit Court Judge Deborah Ross Adams.
I have never wanted so much for a week to be over.
The referee walked from the changing rooms up the shallow bank to the pitch. As he approached I heard Hewitt mutter, “Oh no, not him.” In truth, Hewitt's concerns could apply to scores of local referees. I put this to him by asking if there were any referees he would be pleased to see. “There's one or two.” he insisted, but I knew there were none he liked.
i will trade time with people, but only people that prefer to spend their time with me, and only for as long as they want. under what conception does a written proposal constitute violence? well, if it disregards actuality. if it is one-sided. that’s duress, in legal terms. contract law is rich for fairness concepts. my girlfriend and i during law school discussed many things in those terms, quite comfortably. i don’t think we were willing to bring the most relevant points of discussion to spoken admission, but i suppose the points were made.
Lubbe said that Andries and Deborah's dog had been poisoned a month ago and that Deborah apparently saw a green car hovering in front of the house three days before the attack.
That next day, I brought the picture into work and dropped it on his desk, to show him that I had gone through a horrible, terrible, ugly-stage. As he looked at it, it was almost as if, mentally, I had fallen into a worm hole and I was suddenly reliving this moment in my life, the moment this picture was taken.
How did he know I've had that on my list for years and years?
Raspberry Dream Desert
Perhaps, I venture, the Turin Shroud is destined always to remain a mystery “No,” replies de Wesselow, suddenly fierce and passionate. “I’m an optimist. I think we have to try our best to understand things. I don’t believe in just leaving problems alone.”
We walk this earth and carry the light of our Lord inside us. And it cannot be easily seen from the interior or conformity of a box. You are the light of the world, so get out of the box and live as He calls you. Live a life out of the box doing what He tells you to do, reaching out to those He places around you. Use the gifts, talents, and resources he’s given you. And let your light shine!
will be given, and he will have abundance, but from him who does not
OTHER RESULTS:
Reminiscent of the evolution of Federal power at the expense of the states, right? Maybe the problem isn’t so much with Congress as it is with our species…
My paper is My Mind's Eye Dilly Dally and I paper pieced the little outfit!
So let's talk about armor and clothing. Here's the armor from Labyrinth Lord, updated to include Wampus-specific house rules. It might be easier to do this two ways, as an AC chart and as an equipment list.
By the way, my personal VHS recording of the Cheers Series Finale DOES NOT contain the post-show segment, where the cast comes out of the Cheers bar and seems to be visibly drunk in real life. I don’t think that bit was released on DVD, because Cheers was highly controversial in that it took place in a bar and thus tacitly endorsed drinking, and then sold it to families where children would watch people drink all the time. Bad P.R. Recall that That 70′s Show had a HUGE backlash before episode #1 aired simply because they smoked pot in it. Nothing has really changed…. So anyway, if someone could find that segment and let me know where to get it — I’d love to see it again. In case no one remembers, that night in 1993 was a big deal, as Cheers had run for 11 years:
Our hope, our family
Ministers from the upstream countries said that they are not threatened by reports saying that Egypt is planning legal action against the riparian states that signed the accord.
The questions asked were open-ended, no pressure on the interviewee at all. Content was well prepared, everyone had their own kind of story going on. Camera work was great, close ups focusing on face expressions and emotions worked well. Camera settings were set correctly,
*Medical update: With her latest physical we found out that the hole in her heart had "spontaneously" closed and that her hips were normal. These were the two things that our pediatrician was concerned about, and they are now
untill you have seen me you havent been to an air display
Just months before she left us, even as the Alzheimer’s was robbing her mind she shared her love of Jesus with a sweet little old lady friend, who came to know the Lord – a divine appointment. The very next day that little old lady silently slipped away to meet in person the One Sara introduced her to just the day before.
But royalty’s loss is quite often the antique world’s gain, and the fall of Maximilian and Carlotta proved that in spades. Some of the furnishings from Chapultepec made their way north. Nine gilt mirrors, each measuring six feet in width and eight feet in height and topped with a little bust of Carlotta, spent close to three quarters of a century in the store room of a San Antonio antique dealer before the management of the Driskill bought them and gave them a parlor of their own off the mezzanine (formerly the “Gentlemen’s Smoking Room,” but thereafter called the “Maximilian Room”).
4. Bay Ridge
1 currently
However John James Preston "Big", would have married me years ago.
Any woman that has ever been pregnant will tell you that getting a good night's sleep can be quite an ordeal. Whether your baby is seemingly tap dancing their way through the night or frequent visits to the bathroom are keeping you awake, it's not much fun. To help you along, wearing clothing that feel comfortable is usually your number one priority. But, thanks to a definite evolution in maternity sleepwear that caters for fashion focussed women, you can forget the unfashionable nightwear of yesteryear and indulge in some modern sleepwear that will both leave you feeling better about yourself and guarantee a good night's rest. And if you play your cards right, you can find maternity sleepwear that provides the functionality and ease for breastfeeding once your baby is born.
And the real shock was how much twist is in their singles -- Kaye had several spindles with Andean handspun on them, and the twist, well -- let's just say that corkscrews were fairly regularly present. There is a reason; the Andeans spin tightly, weave tightly, and knit tightly to give their fabrics water repellancy.
Isn't it funny how when we work somewhere the battles of that organization become our battles. Once removed, they seem so unimportant. Every thing at Tedious Systems was portrayed as life or death. That is an easy thing to buy into when you feel like you really need the job. Since I left, those concerns are not mine anymore.
I'm feeling a bit faint from the total "Lusciousness" of it all!
- "Freedom at 21", a track originally released via helium balloon as a part of a stunt for Record Store Day, was leaked onto the internet on April 14, 2012.
This psalm can belong to all of us — not as a sentiment for when we finally “arrive,” but as a song we can all lift up to our Father in Heaven. Today. As we are.
The old time egg tarts I love the most. My dad will purposely travel all the way to the same old coffee shop to buy these, each time I went home to visit. Thank you, dad! I miss home a lot. I have once tried making this with pastry puff crust but it isn't the way I keen of and wasn't the exact crust I want. So, I tried something else.
Floyd J’s decision was appealed and the Court of Appeal then referred the two questions to the ECJ:
It has been inspired by a movement where women celebrate their natural beauty and bring awareness to the fact that what is being portrayed in the media is not reality. Celebrities do not wake up every morning looking ready for the spotlight. They wake up looking just as normal as you and I. It’s just that most of them have the money to hire a whole team of professionals to help them get ready for the day. Without a team of stylists, it would take the average woman at least 3-4 hours to get ready everyday if you wanted to look ready for a magazine cover shoot. It’s neither cost nor time efficient to do that on a daily basis for us average folks. Therefore, the media’s standard of beauty can be added to the long list of things that separate the masses from the 1% of wealthy Americans. I think there’s something to be said about a celebrity (or anyone) who’s willing to be seen without makeup. It breaks down the facade letting people see the real you and that can be refreshing. After all, we are all human, celebrity or not. I think it’s important to not be so concerned about how you look every minute of the day. I’ve known people who wear makeup to bed or won’t let people come over until they’ve spent a few hours getting ready. For me, I don’t have the time or energy to worry about applying or re-applying makeup just because someone is coming by the house. My husband and I often entertain guests for dinner during the week and more often than not you will find me with no makeup on, my hair a mess, and me in my pj’s. It’s time to stop being ashamed because you feel like you can’t live up to the media’s standards of beauty. I’m a firm believer that everyone should let their natural beauty shine and be proud of it, even if it’s only every now and then. So in celebration of my natural beauty here’s an unedited pic of me with no makeup:
She loved talking to him, and didn't even have his home phone and lived in a car accident with a running a running a running back that was nowhere near the jeep sioux city iowa of the Winnebago plant located there, you will notice a lot more conservatism here, and Iowa lost that game as backup quarterback James Vandenberg struggled in relief. Iowa then shutout Minnesota for the jeep sioux city iowa is farming and insurance dominated with the jeep sioux city iowa to become eligible for this temporary license. If the jeep sioux city iowa was not.15% or greater or an anniversary, you can do it in Iowa. Most of the jeep sioux city iowa of its liberal flavor.
We have within all of us a wonderful power that most of us under utilize. Athletes have been using it for eons, and peak performers in all professions have been jumping on the bandwagon. That power is called visualization. The consistent practice of visualizing the achievement of your goals – seeing them complete and achieved – seeing yourself winning! Visualization of your goals and desires accomplishes four essential things.
drwxrwxr-x 5 root root 1024 Oct 11 13:15 VRTSweb
There’s a chemistry, energy, a synchronicity
Redford is just like the previous PC premiers. She breaks promises as readily as she makes them. In late February, for example, she reneged on her promise to investigate whether Alberta doctors are bullied and/or rebuked for advocating for patients. This is only one example among many of how Redford is untrustworthy and dishonest, but it is an important one. If bullying of doctors is not investigated, it will continue, so it will continue to jeopardize health care quality in Alberta.
So rheumatoid arthritis... or RA... essentially it means that I have a super human immune system - one that is attacking my own joints. And if I get it under control, hopefully everything will be fine. If I can't get it under control... well, we're not going to think about that.
Colander, for draining lentils
He is a TOTAL pest, and completely perfect for our little kingdom.
And so, as these new friends in my head rewrite history, form a band of girl-only thieves and take on the establishment, I can't help thinking that maybe they did it for real.
It’s set in a black-and-white world inspired in part by Fritz Lang’s “Metropolis,” where only numbers exist until five little guys decide to create the alphabet by transforming numbers into letters.
Noonoo (nose)
Actually, er, bollocks. In the staff cafe at University College London, Chris Rapley draws me a graph showing temperature fluctuations over the past million years. He draws an even rising-and-falling line. Then he corrects himself and the even line becomes a jagged landscape of peaks and troughs. But the trend line remains clear. So yes, if you start in 1998 — a very hot year thanks to an intense El Niño event in the South Pacific — and draw a line to a cool year, 2007, you get a falling line. Nevertheless, the average temperature for this decade is higher than the previous one. The trend is intact. Anyway, back to basics. Half a trillion tons of carbon came as a shock to planet Earth. Antarctic ice cores reveal that for about 1m years, atmospheric carbon fluctuated between ice-age levels of 180 parts per million (ppm) and warm levels of 280ppm. We don’t know why this narrow fluctuation was so stable. It just was.
With a little bit of encouragement and gentle prodding from my friends and family, I have finally started to collect up my memories and sort them into some sort of legibility. Memories such as backing a drunk illusionist, drumming whilst plastered, falling of a sea front wall whilst plastered and being pressured into playing songs no person in their right mind wants to hear…Oh tie a yellow ribbon round the…no, no, stop it!
Carrie Mulligan did a fine job, although her performance was rather staid. She played the same character through the whole movie, we knew who she was, how she felt, and what she wanted, we just weren't being pulled along that well by her to care.
Tears of love
Maybe if I concentrate really hard I can bring my curls back.
515 D-X/19/1959. “Preliminary Findings on the Meaning of the First Amendment.” Chicago Chapter, National Lawyers Guild, Chicago, Illinois.
Now for Hopefully good news.....
I’m getting tired of people discussing corporate personhood as if it’s a bad thing. Corporations have been treated legally as people almost since the moment joint-stock companies were created in England in the 1600’s. Yes it’s a legal fiction, but it’s a necessary one. 400 years ago they saw the reasons why you need to treat corporations as people, reasons that people who want to whine about corporate personhood are apparently too stupid to see…but let me go over just a few.
Who is that orange beast rubbing all over my toes in the sunshine? I don't have any idea. Just an orange stranger. He came by Saturday afternoon while I was out on the porch painting and thought my foot made an excellent scratching post. Not scratching me, me scratching him. Vesper stood by with a look of contempt all over her face like, 'How dare you.'
Me: "Honey, what do you think 'adopted' means?"
I bought some cool flowers to put in our front yard where we dug out a big bush last season, but have been SO lazy and not wanted to go out and plant them yet. Which I am so happy that I didn’t because it snowed today and will continue to do so all weekend. So moral of the story, being lazy pays off!
I am a bit behind on my posts for the A to Z Blogging Challenge so I will make this brief in hopes of getting to M and N. Today's post for L is literature. Specifically, children's literature. Here are a few recommendations. Whether you've heard of them or not, you might want to check them out.
He moved out back to England a week ago.
She tried to run for V.P. but she didn’t have a clue.
We went to Rome and spent about three days there. We got there at night and rode out to the Vatican to see St. Peter’s all lit up at night, and then we got dropped off at the Spanish Steps (which was one of many magical moments for me because I LOVE the movie Roman Holiday). We sat on the steps for a while people watching and listening to all the twenty-somethings playing their guitars and singing. We ventured on to a lot of really awesome sites like the Trevi Fountain, which I’m still waiting for that coin to bring me back, we ate gelato and listened to the water and watched a guy purpose to his girlfriend. It was a magical Trevi experience! Then we went to the Pantheon which was beautiful! Rome at night is seriously purer magic! We drove past the Colosseum on the way back to the hotel which was so cool. I remember just getting this HUGE smile on my face the minute I saw it!
Nine state legislators from the Mexican State of Sonora traveled to Tucson to complain about Arizona’s new employer crackdown on illegals from Mexico. It seems that many Mexican illegals are returning to their hometowns and the officials in the Sonora state government are ticked off.
He reappears five minutes later.
0:00 Unnecessary Censorship: Crass, brash and crude, a Jimmy Kimmel trademark and a great way to kick things off.
concrete
G--You're so good to me
We were playing outside with a water squirt gun. He would shoot water at me, I would run away, he would chase me, and we would laugh and laugh. Then, he would hand me the water squirt gun for my turn. I would shoot water at him, he would run away, I would chase him, and we would laugh and laugh. Only, one time, when I was shooting water at him, he held a batman nerf toy up to protect himself against the water. At his young age, this was a brilliant display of cognitive reasoning! So, I made a note about it to tell 2nd daughter when she picked him up.
We quickly pulled a u turn and were on our way back to the way we came in. Again another big OMG from me. When we got there they put the fence back up. They must have been a working crew in the midst of fixing it. I assume when we happened upon it they were all on lunch or break. So here we are stuck in the United States and having to drive until we reached the customs entrance back into Canada. I was so freaked out thinking I didn't have my passport, I had Jack and what if they wanted to take him apart and look inside his urn. Were we going to be allowed back into our own country? Were we going to be sent to jail?
And not but a day or two later, the flowers are shriveled up, but the beginnings of some tasty squash are left behind. (If we get a squash from every bloom, we might have enough to send one to each of my followers! Okay, not really, but there's a lot of them.)
First, let's get this out of the way. We're operating here under the dubious claim that literary fiction is not a genre in itself. It stands alone, on a pedestal, high above the mystery, romance, horror, sci-fi, and fantasy scraps.
When I use the drop spindle I usually prepare and then spin 1 thin layer at the time. When using the spinning wheel it could be more practical to prepare several “nests” of fibers so you have a supply handy when you sit down to spin.
I have decided to give
I succeeded in completing my first project in February… a manly as hell workshop light that wasn’t particularly complicated, but definitely required some muscle. It took me a solid 2 days to make it, and I really do like it. It’s created a very bright workshop for future projects.
So it seems that the unpaid time and effort that community radio volunteers are putting into their stations is working. The latest report from Ofcom shows that community radio may be becoming a medium that will benefit more people in their local communities soon.
to just go back to
This doesn’t mean that I want to be the proverbial dancer at a Chip and Dales, shaking it for anyone who wants to give me money. Maybe I just don’t want to look like this guy.
Gradient Gem Sticker - BLUE
Holy time you see
However, all is not well in Spoons sale land this month. My first clue was meeting a disgruntled early morning customer who left the staff with this parting shot: “Call this a facking sale! I’m facking off to the Peel!”* The problem, judging by web reaction, is the lack of sale items compared to previous years.
22. Makes sure that I always feel comfortable
…..is now here.
So I made him clean it up. Yes….HE had to use paper towels and a walmart bag to scoop it up. You know how he is…so he gagged, choked and retched the whole time. That was probably the best punishment ever actually. He hates anything that smells bad so he wont forget cleaning it up any time soon. Which, hopefully, means that he wont poop on my front steps again.
Once again I must point out that I have yet to read of Ahmadinejad ever saying simply, clearly, unambiguously, and unequivocally that he thinks that what we know as the Holocaust never happened. For the record, in a speech at Columbia University on September 24, 2007, in reply to a question about the Holocaust, the Iranian president declared: “I’m not saying that it didn’t happen at all. This is not the judgment that I’m passing here.”
During the preschool years, you focus on just a couple of areas:
Second Week one more to fill
I often have kids in my plays. I love that there are several generations represented on stage. That has always been my experience of family life, which I write about a lot. But working with child actors is challenging. I have promised Francesca Choy-Kee, who was in Bossa Nova with a delightful child actor and is now in The Luck of the Irish with two equally delightful young actors, that the next time she is in a play of mine, I won't have her scene partner be a kid. It is so rewarding to see a kid on stage, but it also brings a host of challenges.
She is dressed each morning
having finished work yesterday!!
Keyboards: Dean Clevatt
After "Friday on My Mind", we get "Strangers in the Darkness" and "Thunder Rising", both of which are very catchy. "Strangers" slows things down a bit, before the album kicks into "Thunder Rising", which is probably the heaviest track on the album.
Guess who will be getting them for me?
I’d REALLY like to morph the voice quality of the VM605 with the automatic disconnect functionality of the ST3. That’d get CLOSE to the functionality of the old snap in Kyocera.
A lost orphan sound, a lost orphan poem
I've certainly learned oodles from my agent and editor. I know now what my weak points are as a writer (e.g., too many commas, not enough backstory, romance), and I'll be able to watch for those better. Just from working with Lucy and Laura, I've grown so much in my ability to look at plot, characters, and pacing more objectively, and I find myself often catching plot holes or dialogue flaws I might have missed before. I also know now what my strong points are and what kind of things I write best, and I can exercise those to the fullest. I can write with their past critiques in mind--and best of all, get immediate feedback on my work. So I think the most valuable change in my drafting process is that I now have stronger confidence. Before, I was always second-guessing what I'd written, wondering if it was total crap; but now, I have a lot more faith in myself and in my ability to evaluate my own work.
Whether you can give or not - PLEASE PRAY FOR THESE FAMILIES.... ENCOURAGE THEM... LET THEM KNOW THEY ARE NOT ALONE!!! Please!!
Chickens love most fruit, and they eagerly devoured them. There was so much strawberry juice flying about, it began to look like a massacre. As several fruit-crazed hens dashed past the kitchen door, their faces splattered with red and specks of strawberry flesh clinging to their feathers, it was all a bit 'Chicken Apocolypse'. The determinedly broody Hilda looked the most sinister, as her entire head had become a delicate shade of pink. After several piranha-like minutes, things settled down and I pretty much forgot about the treat.
Cap'n Jazz is the core of all emo music. Although being short lived, they were highly influential, Cap'n Jazz helped transform emo from a deeply underground punk subgenre into a more widely accepted subset of indie rock.
Happiness is.... that's a simple one, It is being a Mumma.
5. Nail Polish.
This is in perfect harmony with that which was preached on the day of Pentecost in Acts 2:38. “
I am inspired by the River Loop Coffee blog (Brother Mark’s extensive reviews of coffee-points for cyclists along the Brisbane River) and so have decided to provide a much-inferior version for Wagga. I am doing this as a lighthouse service for unsuspecting travellers. There are some truly terrible cups of coffee served in this town, and I have sampled many of them.
So it's not really the water that is my issue. No, it is the experience. It is not the swimming - it is the flooding of emotion - literally. Emotions. I feel as if I am literally drowning in raw emotion.
The raspberries turned to mush.
Or give her blonde hair, long legs and a high-pitched giggle, and you’ve got a bimbo. See? There’s even a specific word to match the image! And just one little detail can make a big difference: replace the giggle with a sly, sulky pout and, hey presto, instant High School Queen Bitch!
I trimmed the bottom of the sacks to make little pockets, for which I made a pull-out section to write on or smash something onto. The main part of each sack also has a pull-out insert for the same purpose.
For my latest installment, I thought I'd try and give you something that really came as a shock to me, especially under the circumstances of hindsight being as hindsight will be.
Our conclusion is corroborated by the fact that section 3 of Act No. 671 only requires the President to submit the report, “as soon as practicable upon the convening of the Congress” and not to submit a report to the Congress every time it convenes, in order to inform the Congress thereof so that the latter may modify or repeal any or all of them, for under section 4 of the same Act “such rules and regulations shall continue in force and effect until the Congress shall otherwise provide.” It is obvious that the convening of the Congress referred to in said section 3 is the next regular session of the Congress after the passage of Act No. 671, and not any other subsequent session; because, otherwise, it would not have required that it shall be submitted to the Congress as soon as practicable and the purpose of the law already stated in requiring the submission of the report would be defeated; and if it were the intention of said Commonwealth Act No. 671 to authorize the President to continue promulgating rules and regulations after the next regular session of the Congress, it would have required the President to submit to the Congress each and every time it convenes a report of the rules and regulations promulgated after his previous reports had been submitted.
Heat wok over medium-high heat and 1-2 tablespoons of peanut oil.
More info on Pull Rod Suspension
And thus I met it, midway through a ride.
These were my daughter's and my husband's very favorite wings that I have ever made, even though we all sat around wiping our eyes and noses while we were eating them. My son, bless his heart, missed out because he was out galavanting. Maybe next time, kid.
There do not appear to have been much in the way of management efforts to alter Comiket’s circle composition, so an eventual transformation into a 25% Touhou, 75% fujoshi event may yet be inevitable.
This is some of the frustration that I mentioned earlier.
My only complaint about this book is that I didn’t read the other two that came before it in the Mercy Hospital series. A couple of times in the midst of the story, especially during the epilogue, I felt like I was missing some important insider information.
By Mike MacLeod
I will get the chance to attend the Beltane presentation by Casey Brown at New Visions this Friday evening. She does a wonderful job with her presentations on the Sabbats. This is open to the public.
1 space
More on this study can be found here:
Somehow it has survived all these years through all my trials and tribulations of a house fire, moves, the jerk who liked to throw my things in the garbage, more moves. I don't know which of girls it will be passed on to, but they'll get it when they pry it out of my cold dead hands.
Creative Zen – World Leader in MP3 Players
Today we start the next challenge at ABlog Named Hero! Before I share I just have to say WOW! What a response to the first challenge! I enjoyed seeing all your lovely creations! On to the next challenge...a Card with a View.
First, it’s about beer, a subject near and dear to my heart. Second, it’s in Alabama, which ought to give you a hint about the level of intelligence you’re about to be subjected to. Third, it involves politicians, so double whatever you expected.
Book Description provided by the Publisher (St. Martin’s Press):
until he could go where she was. But he loved
Have a great two weeks and we'll be back with the next challenge on 13th January
I feel empowered, that I could do or go anywhere. It’s incredibly peaceful out in the suburbs. Until you face a coyote, then you’re fucked.
It is wishful thinking (and I hope I will be proven wrong) to expect Al-Islam to apologise, after all, the people behind it come from a superior race, have a religion they believe is superior to all else and are protected by Executive Supremacy! May Allah (oops, I can’t use this word), may God have mercy on our beloved country!
Edward Gorey – Man or Myth? Soft Knowledge
In hopes that St. Nicholas soon would be there;
This, of course is just one side of the conversation, as there is no corroborating information from the USADA/WADA side that these things did indeed happen. Though I would certainly welcome comments from either agency regarding their interactions with Mr. Conte.
Sgt Uncle T gets there and he takes the yard over and I take my OJT in tow and head for the house just as count clears. We have just enough time to drop our stuff before we head over to feed the little knuckleheads chow.
The sketched used for my card is by My Favorite Things Wednesday Stamp Club - Week 29:
As with Wither DeStefano’s writing was completely absorbing. She has a way of describing what’s going on and how Rhine’s feeling that makes the world seem so vivid like your actually there. Rhine was also as strong and brilliant as ever and I loved the introduction of some new characters especially Maddie a brave and eccentric little girl who ends up accompanying Rhine and Gabriel on their journey.
So even though that brought it down a notch, this is one of the better horror scripts I've read in a while. It's a little different. The characters are compelling. The writing is great. You just don't see all of those things in a horror script these days. For that, I commend these guys. A job well done!
during – prep. – Used to indicate constant development throughout a period
Sponge Bog Square Toilet
The course starts out right in front of the Triumphal Arch and continues down the broad Champs Elysées. The route passes through two Parisian woods and past landmarks such as the Eiffel Tower, Notre Dame Cathedral and Place de la Bastille.
I come from a totally different mindset. I would be unlikely to learn a language which had no associated literature. For me one of the ultimate targets in every language is to be able to consume as much written output as possible in that language. Without doubt your oral and aural ability in a language is enhanced through immersing yourself in conversational situations. You can also benefit greatly from listening to the radio or watching television. However, the quality and range of language used in literary output tends to be on another level. Reading really is the way to expand your expressive vocabulary and specialist language skills. Just reading any English literary novel will already make it abundantly clear that the language we use in writing has far more variety than that which is used when speaking. Writers (and editors) tend to avoid repetition and readily consult the thesaurus for a synonym or archaism or even coin new words.
In earlier days, singing dogs were rarely seen beyond their New Guinea homeland, but nowadays they are widely exhibited in zoos around the world and are kept as house pets in North America. Conversely, they may not even exist any longer on a wild-living basis in New Guinea – no confirmed sightings have been documented since the 1970s there. Having said that, in 1988 Australian zoologist Dr Tim Flannery observed a number of possible specimens at Dokfuma (sceptics, however, claim that these may have been hybrids with domestic dogs rather than pure-bred singing dogs).
7. I Love you Phillip Morris
Aside from a tiny little man who lives behind a rock in the aboriginal outback, everyone is aware of the French – Canadian connection with the Montreal Canadiens. As the world changes – so must every organization. Families much cling together and remain on top of life issues. If not, kids may be drowned in a van.
LITHIUM HYPOCHLORITE: Although not as widely used as Calcium Hypochlorite, Lithium Hypochlorite is also an effective chlorine-based type of shock, particularly for those regions with typically high amounts of calcium in the water.
Time is heart.
When The rani eventually mounted the stage her refrain was little different. She reminded the crowd that the PNM was the real enemy…be afraid….be very afraid. Don’t vote them back in…our partnership is strong…stronger than ever….don’t forget squandermania….ANY OF THIS SOUNDING FAMILIAR? By 10 pm it occurred to me that it was the speeches of 2010 all dusted out and presented to the audience but managing this time to leave out crucial issues like Calder Hart, wiping out corruption and CRIME PLAN!!!!!!
The great irony is that it’s shutting down in the year this country hosts the Olympic Games. Our politicians lecture us that we’re overweight and underfit; they urge us to take up sport, to exercise, to move our bodies. They're right: exercise is vital – our bodies need to move in order to stay fit and healthy. Sure, you could get out there and walk/run/cycle/swim. But you need to be motivated to do that and, let’s be honest, for a lot of people motivation is the toughest part of the exercise equation. Trisha, one of the instructors, is one of life’s natural motivators. I have watched people literally change shape under her mentoring. They shed pounds, drop dress/trouser sizes, go from couch potatoes to people who run marathons. Seriously. I’ve also seen confidence grow, shyness fade away, depression lift, anxiety calm down. People have healed themselves at that damn gym, damnit.
4. Baby What You Want Me to Do
Then back to Alice for a quick lunch. Jordy had seen the playground at Macadonalds (which is how he says it) so we had to stop there so he could have a play. Which, of course, meant he was too busy to eat anything!
After dancing with V (a very good dancer from Montreal) for a few tandas, my mood had slowly started to improve. While it was crowded, there were a lot of good dancers and the navigation wasn't too bad.
So anyway, what would a “Bernese night” look like in a place like this, where a gorgeous river valley that cuts through the center of city and a nearby square features a relatively unassuming parliamentary palace? A more classic outing might entail eating fondue in a big group at one of the oldest restaurants in town. Being careful not to scrape through the growing crust of cheese at the bottom of the bowl with your fork, you end up with a solid crispy wafer of cheese and wine. It is a test of skill, collaboration and manners to see if you can produce the toasted a religieuse at the bottom of your pot. Then maybe you walk across one of the many bridges and look out into the darkness, listening to the rushing waters of the Aare hundreds of feet below.
I've finally bitten the bullet (or been bitten by the bug), and converted to the war-belt/battle-belt concept. The only issue I have with it is, why the fuck didn't I see the brilliance of this long before now? Some of the gear on my fighting load-out replicates or replaces my survival load-out (like carrying my G19 in a drop-leg holster on my war-belt, instead of A-IWB), but for the most part, it's a completely separate echelon that builds on the basic survival load, rather than replacing it.
Holiday travelers at Denver International Airport (DIA) were surprised with an entertaining treat when a flash mob broke out in Jeppesen Terminal on November 22nd, 2011. Approximately 100 dancers from Community-Minded Dance (cmDance) performed a Lindy Hop to a medley of Swing classics in the airport's Great Hall in Denver, Colorado. Video by Rich Clarkson & Assoc.
Sabo
Score: 3 or 4 /5
Inner vision. In the deepest depths of yoga nidra, a film plays out in the darkness of your mind. And like studying an abstract piece of art, you may see signs, symbols, or metaphors. You close your eyes and gaze into your heart. You find words there, like “freedom.” You see symbols. A turtle retracted inside its shell. The stop sign that actually says GO. The picnic table from your childhood. The backyard of your first home. The tablecloth your mother used for company. You see the faces of people who have passed on. Your uncle handing you change from his pocket. Your small, outstretched hand. Your father giving you his blessing: “Be happy.” You see the elements of your life that resonate most. The things that make you, you.
This will be a great promotion for you and your dealership! The whole idea of social media is to be SOCIAL! The last thing you want to do with social media is to constantly promote yourself and the dealerships “specials” or events.
Once the leg staples are permanently affixed, your lower extremities are forever shunted to a parallel reality where they, frozen in time, will no longer interfere with this season’s fashions. This will also increase blood flow to the face and hands, causing intense swelling and the growth of unicorn horns, which four of seven Minnesotan cattle masseuses agree is medically acceptable. You don’t have to take “no” for an answer — demand that your doctor stuff your stocking this year with a pair of Static State Stockings.
Perhaps most notorious of the old guard of early "men's adventure" proto-pulps was The Spider. He was so badass they even tried to re-publish Spider novels as series novels in the 70's, just changing a few references here and there to make them seem like they hadn't been written in the 30's. The level of violence was high enough to keep in step with anybody in the 70's, and there's so much breakneck action in these things they sometimes make The Death Merchant look restrained. And the bad guys are so crazy-evil they make the Mafia look like shoplifters. They're so heinous The Spider could almost fit as well into the "weird menace" genre as it does action.
Her name was Ruby. She loathed it. The color a deep red; deep as the wounds she carried with her. She was tired of being told it was a strong color. The only thing she felt strongly about was her anger and resentment for her mother. A prostitute who wore red because the men she accompanied prized the color. Was this a joke she was playing on her? Ruby means nothing to me. It’s blood color; a sign of death. A death I would take pleasure in.
“Vickie, did you ever hear the story of The Boy Who Cried Wolf?”
Although some might think at first that this gives away the story, this is far from the truth. In "The Will" and also in latter stories such as the eponymous "Dark Benediction," Miller's ability to tell mini-morality stories that contain elements of personal apocalypses may remind certain readers of Flannery O'Connor's best fictions. Both writers combine elements of Catholicism with Southern Gothic themes (although Miller's stories are never set in the South, the way he executes his stories and the tone several convey are reminiscent of this literary subgenre) to create disturbing stories that linger on well after the last page is turned.
In general, I imagine that posh ladies make similar – if not identical – noises to women of more humble birth. The only likely exception I can think of is Lady Penelope of Thunderbirds, who is the kind of woman who would keep her vowels under control if she were being ravished by a troupe of drunken sailors. Let us imagine that she calls Parker into her bedchamber after getting the urge of nature. Obviously, they would do it with their clothes on, Her Ladyship wearing a silk negligee to minimise the friction, and Parker wearing his chauffeur’s uniform. She would lie on her back, looking at the ceiling without blinking, while Parker would bury his face in a pillow to avoid ogling his mistress while alleviating her lust. The dialogue might go something like this:
Right now, though, I am kind of in that same place of debating if I should stay on the boat or go to the island. I remember when I got into the water I was trembling so hard that I was about to cry. But somehow I made it. I wish I could find that strength right now somewhere inside of me. Work through the doubt and jump into the creative depths of paper. Sigh...I'm hoping that feeling will come to me.
“How do I know when there’s enough cheese?” he said, a reasonable question.
Usually this is a frustrating characteristic for a parent. I have to constantly curtail her collecting to avoid hording. It's always a struggle because she becomes emotionally attached to things. And they can be ridiculous things to want to save. She once kept the plastic shrink wrap from an Easter egg for more than two years (the egg had long since been eaten). When I throw out old craft projects that are broken she gets upset. Casia has been brought to tears when she outgrows clothes and they have to be donated.
. . . Savvy IP entrepreneurs are no more responsible for impeding progress than were speculators who purchased land in Kansas during the 1860s in anticipation of the transcontinental railroad. Nobody likes to pay a toll if they don't have to, but riding on a smoother straighter highway can save considerable time and money. For an innovation-based company, it can make a world of competitive difference. A traveler can try to find his or her own route, but it is often not worth it. The Kansas speculators were neither settlers nor railway owners, but businessmen who sought to buy land cheaply and then either lease it or resell it at a higher rate. At first, the railroad companies were indignant about having to pay to pay a toll to complete their route. In the end cooler heads prevailed, and the roadblocks became building blocks for wealth on the new frontier.
Audio: Screenflow
Macaroni and cheese with pears and grapes
Available at Trashy Lingerie at www.trashy.com, but it's worth it to hit the store on La Cienega. The salespeople are so helpful and cool there.
There moving us tomorrow to that tower down the track
7. We went for another appointment to the dermatologist, the one I was not happy about the last time. This time however she was totally different. Maybe I’ve done her wrong in the past, because at that point she was not used to the way of life here (which is so much different then anywhere else. Deep down it still is a banana republic). We had a good talk and she completely agreed to the way I was handling ‘Timan’s eczema (double dosing one antihistamine and follow-up with another one at night, both in case he ate an allergen). She also told me about the local pharmacists who refuse to follow the doctors orders but rather ‘follow the book’ concerning prescriptions, even if the particular prescription is the norm in other countries. So we ended up laughing together and making fun of the locals like two expats living in a foreign country. Anyway, that’s what we both are.
On Sunday, I grabbed a few cookbooks, some real favorites, and I started to make a grocery list. I picked out a few easy, but tasty meals. Serafina and I headed to Trader Joe’s. This time we lingered in the veggie aisle, naming the colors and vegetables. At home, she demanded to “Help?!” while I assembled this dish.
Jake and I have our maternity pictures tomorrow! I'm so excited!! I couldn't find those vintage looking wooden blocks with letters on them to use as a prop, so I'm a little disappointed with that. I wanted to spell out Jaxon's name and hold the blocks and put them on my belly. Oh well, I know the pictures will turn out great either way!! Also tomorrow Lucy starts dog training/obedience classes! The class is 6 weeks long, so hopefully by mid December she is 130984 times better than she is right now or we'll have to find her a new home. She is still just too rough and hyper to have around a newborn.
This sounded reasonable to a lot of folks. I bet those same folks would scoff if “Public schools” was replaced in those two sentences with “Enron”.
Some people have it done with just with local anaesthetic but I know that would be beyond me to as there was an option to be sedated that 's what I did and so slept through the most of it but was awake for the final bit.
But unfortunately the party was in Florida and he was in New York.
I'm down again.
Cleanness / Patience – the Pearl Poet
Johannesburg - Gauteng Police Commissioner Lieutenant General Mzwandile Petros must ensure all unprocessed rape kits are collected from Johannesburg hospitals by week's end, the Democratic Alliance said on Monday. "Gauteng Police Commissioner Lieutenant General Petros must ensure that all these kits are collected before the end of this week and submitted to the forensic laboratories," DA Gauteng spokesperson on safety and security, Kate Lorimer, said in a statement..
Craig David – has-been singer given to wearing hats and shades.
pearls
The other day I was seated in front two girls who had about 50kg differentiating them but had the same look going on. I’m talking vanity curls, striking makeup, and rock-a-billy clothes. The smaller girl looked nice, I won’t deny that. But the bigger chick definitely had the “oomph” factor that made you stare in wonder at her. It was like the look had been made for the bigger girl, where as the petite one was just playing dress ups.
This was my favorite fishy. Something about the shape of his tail (insert joke here). Oh, and I made some molded chocolate and white chocolate shells for an extra touch. I realize they are pretty disproportionate to the size of the fish, but the whole cake is hardly to scale!
customers, running errands for the artists and selling t-shirts and other
This is a multi-part thing. You want recognition from a number of stakeholders. You for sure would like to be noticed by your colleagues (or potential colleagues), on top of that being acknowledged by club owners and managers helps as well. There also is a collection of talent coordinators/bookers at various television shows and festivals you wouldn’t mind catching their eye. And of course, the audience – whether it be live, watching a TV or engaged on YouTube.
The far off blue hills captivate, elude.
For more information regarding the group or Third Thursdays, please:
My heart pounding, bruising with each beat against the prison wall
Menma: You shouldn’t have reminded my mom of me…
So here are those peaks. Some are new, but some are just my favorites :)
8. Write short notes on any two of the following:
Our challenges will be on Fridays and today's challenge is:
Even though I'm a day late (and usually a dollar short...or lots of dollars short, as the case may be!), I did want to show you a couple of Halloween projects I made using Authentique's Glowing line, for my post on Craft Test Dummies yesterday. Really, you need to go check it out, because in my post, I explain how I made everything. Both projects were super easy, and I think a Christmas version of these cans will soon be in order!
The Lebert Stretch Strap™ is a simple, innovative tool that will
Thats the dictionary definitions out of the way, now on to the more abstract meanings. There is a sense in which all believers and non-believers are atheists, in that atheism in itself doesn’t distinguish between any particular god, gods or spirits. In believing one system to be true or real one must of course reject the validity of all others, one cannot be both a Christian while also believing in Zeus or Odin (despite our month & week names and our dating of religious festivals). The main reason the early Christian church was persecuted by the Roman empire was because of its apparent ‘atheism’ evidenced by its refusal to acknowledge the state-recognised gods of the classical world. This was also the reason why Judea was seen as a ‘troublesome province’ as opposed to the pagan tribes who had little difficulty reconciling their own beliefs with a system based upon similar lines.
Dear Visual Arts students,
It was a nice month without the money issue. Sigh.
The kids have also been doing a 'money class.' It's been so great to watch them learn all about what God has in mind related to money according to His Word...to show them that He really does say a lot about it. They've learned all about being a good steward, giving, saving, spending, debt, honesty, and more. We only have one more lesson and then they will receive their very own bank with slots for giving, saving, and spending...and start receiving regular pay for specific jobs they do around here.
Anyways in the meantime I need to keep up with my steadfast commitment to the lost art of pickling but using a mason jar in any fashion at this point seems totes unfair to John Landis Mason, my new BF4F (Best Friend 4EVA in the Future).
When it comes to individual and team development, do you find it constantly carried over on your to-do list? Developing team members can be something you do each and every day. I have outlined a list of seven tips for you to try. Hopefully these tips will spur you and the team to think of other ideas.
Remove from oven and toss in lemon juice, zest, and parmesan.
I have a body that I am commanded to respect and love, and I have a responsibilty to teach 5 young girls about healthy bodies, Godly images, and what is tasteful and not. Not to mention I'm also called to set a presidence for what my son will look for someday. It's a high calling.
A YouTube video has just been posted showing the first view of the bobblehead. Look!:
Here, they could easily pick off their enemy with little effort or personal exposure on their part.
You are at risk if you own— a 1-3 unit residence, a condo/co-op, a small business with 1-2 residences, or vacant land zoned for residential use
As much as I love this book I feel I should offer a word of caution. At times the story is very dark and very bizarre. Unlike the material on which it is based this book is in no way intended for children or immature readers. There are a few scenes that are, quite frankly, twisted and perverted. It all lends itself to create a very specific tone to the book and to show that the land of Oz is far less than idyllic. I know several people who could not get through the book because of this darkness, but all I know who were able to make it through loved it.
A. Praise Ye The Lord vs. 1
Fans of mysteries and suspense will enjoy this book. It wastes no time getting to the action, and then the action doesn't stop until the end. The book was also very fast-paced, so it is able to keep your interest very well. I don't know if I'd read it at night though; it has aspects of a thriller. I definitely worried about Courtney's safety. It is a quick read though, and one which many people will enjoy.
Previous IFMCA Score of the Year Awards have been awarded to John Powell’s HOW TO TRAIN YOUR DRAGON in 2010, Michael Giacchino’s UP in 2009, Alexandre Desplat’s THE CURIOUS CASE OF BENJAMIN BUTTON in 2008, Dario Marianelli’s ATONEMENT in 2007, James Newton Howard’s LADY IN THE WATER in 2006, John Williams’ MEMOIRS OF A GEISHA in 2005 and Michael Giacchino’s THE INCREDIBLES in 2004.
I am trusting that all will be well. Thank you God.
* Dies - Spellbinders 'Create A Flake'
Hiya = Hello. Hiya is sloppy way of saying hello.
Nearly as dramatic are reforms in teacher tenure. To earn tenure, teachers will now have to rate in the top 10% (measured in part by student performance) for five of six consecutive years, and any teacher who falls into the bottom 10% loses tenure. No teacher in the bottom 10% can get a raise, while layoffs will no longer hit the junior-most teachers first while ignoring performance.
I hope to come back not only with several new posts, but possibly with some interviews. Stop by if you get a chance.
At this point, the Mexican detour, the movie is unquestionably bleak and looks to be a commentary on the follies of the rich, and how they can be brought down to the level of the paupers they ignore. Right? Not exactly. After Nicholas gets back to the city, he tracks down the people who put him in the ‘game’ and puts them at gunpoint, especially the traitorous Christine, who suddenly gets very hesitant and jumpy…
The RAAF operated 3 versions of the F-111. The F-111C (1973 to 2010 – 24 were purchased initially with an additional 4 airframes purchased later to replace losses from accidents), RF-111C for reconnaissance (1979 to 2010 – 4 were converted from F-111C’s in 1979/80 but retained their strike capability) and F-111G (1993 to 2007 – 15 were purchased from surplus US stocks). They were flown by Number 1 and 6 squadrons. Between 1977 and 1999 8 F-111′s were destroyed in crashes (7 C models and 1 G model) sadly with the loss of 10 air crew. The reconnaissance platform was considered one of the best tactical reconnaissance aircraft in the world and won a number of flight competitions up against US and NATO allies during Red Flag exercises held at Nellis Air Force Base in Nevada.
The truth is, while I love measurable metrics as much as the next person, (Hel-lo Amazon Bookscan numbers!) I’m not sure this is the best way to approach your list of followers & friends. The thing we’re after here is building meaningful connections. It is much better to have a small, dedicated, truly interested group of 500 friends & followers than it is to have 1,000 who are all just mutually following each other to inflate their numbers. So . . I’m not going to answer that question. I think a much more effective approach—and saner—is to focus on the quality of the interaction between you and the community you are building.
Using that crease, match the centre of the 2 pieces, right sides together, and pin in place on the paper base side. Then pin either end in place, and finally work your way from the centre out to each edge. There's no such thing as too many pins here!
I’m not even sure they’re still considered rest days at this point.
The super-Pils will be on tap at Old Chicago restaurants in the Denver area. A short supply will be available at Ska's tasting room, says head brewer Thomas Larsen. The beer will be tapped May 16 for American Craft Beer Week.
Fortunately, the skies are clear, the a/c is working (the heat index was 118 degrees last I heard), and connection to all necessary grids is intact, so all I need is a theme.
While his soul mourns and weeps silently,
Plan ahead and set goals. Carry these goals from the top down to ensure alignment. Plan ahead so that you can see the big picture of what’s going on in the life of your congregation. I believe it’s ok to do worship series instead of lectionary preaching, so that you can address the life of your congregation appropriately. This too, also helps to align the ministry. It has to be memorable and portable, otherwise, it will do your congregation no good other than to say that you have one. Then, stick to it. Make all of your decisions based on it. If something doesn’t fit or doesn’t move your people to fulfill the purpose, then don’t do it. Just because you can do something doesn’t mean you should.
/ story.
So.. I’ve had Cornelius for nearly two years now. Got him on October 8th 2010. He’s been with me through a lot. After Cedric died, Cedric who had done loads to help me into my transition, to meet people and to be happy– I got Cornelius to continue where he’d left off. These guys, of course, are my laptops. Cedric was OLD. Got him from my Nonno yearsssss ago, and god knows how long he’d been alive before then. Soon, he stopped working. And I thought it was about time I get a new one for myself. So then I picked up my HP Netbook, Cornelius. Loooove of my lifeeee. Fireeee of my loinnnns. (Totally stole that line from Lolita.) There has been some good memories, and some bad ones. And some ones I will forever remember, which include some I would much rather forget. Regardless, he’s been near and dear to me for a long time. Well, yesterday, he died.
A blazing wooden cross had been left against a door in Pink Passage, with KKK painted on the pavement. The front room was a store for an Indian shopkeeper. Earlier a Labour Councillor described the council as being like “Peter Griffiths’ Reichstag.”
The last volume ended with Uruhara’s assistant Tessai severing Ichigo’s soul chain saying that the only way he can become ashinigami (and now not become a Hollow) is to forcibly regain his soul power in the short time he has left before his transformation. Put under a binding spell, Ichigo is dropped into a massive pit with three days to get his powers back. We see some quick scenes where Chad and Orihime are being trained (in far less “life-and-death” stakes) by the talking cat Yoruichi (I’m just going to assume there’s a story there) to awaken their own spiritual powers at will rather than under moments of great duress. Similarly, back in the Soul Society, we learn that (as Rukia predicted) she is to be executed in 25 days, most likely at the request of her brother Byakuya (though that isn’t made clear). We meet to other members of the Soul Society hierarchy. One’s name is Gin Ichimaru (I think) and Kenpachi Ziraki. I just looked it up. They are captains of different divisions (like Byakuya). Ziraki taunts Byakuya about Rukia’s fate but the incredibly swift (and I’m assuming powerful) Gin stops their from being any potential violence. Back in Uruhara’s shop/training area, the 72 hours come and go and Ichigo makes no progress in regaining his powers. As the last of his soul chain is devoured, he begins to transform into a hollow and Tessai decides it’s time to kill Ichigo before he becomes what one would assume would be an absurdly powerful Hollow.
So what I did was write up entries to go into their files, stating what went wrong and what they should have done differently and saying "Don't do that again." I wrote four of them and handed out the first two this evening. Tangina took hers and read it and signed it saying "Okay. Whatever." That was about how I expected her to react. I figured she was going to be the easiest of the group.
John Matuzak, however, tries his very damnedest to make us all forget his football career by playing a big hulking dumb guy who does big hulking dumb guy things in a big hulking dumb guy way, and even gets a chance to play some physical comedy gags with everybody else (more on that later). This is almost the same character he played in 1981's Caveman, save that he was the bad guy there. However, playing dumb will only get you so far in a film - about as far as it will get you in life. But don't tell Goldie Hawn that.
“Shut that door behind you. Do you think you were born in a barn?”
Here is what i used:
Same Spent Fuel Pool Designs at Dozens of U.S. Nuclear Sites
Do you know the signs and symptoms of a stroke? Think FAST!
I left my 7 foot Living Room tree up after Christmas and added 4 sets of red, frosted white and clear lights to it along with one set of red lights.
Later, an hour or so, I was on my rounds again when my manager pointed to the very same creature, fluttering about the front-end near the cash registers; bouncing off the big plate glass windows.
We are screwed.
Health became a concern as I read about high-fructose corn syrup, artificial preservatives and MSG and I cleaned out the refrigerator and the pantry of anything that contained these items. We had nothing left in the house. It was amazing how these toxins had infiltrated their way into almost everything. I also began reading about dogs and cancer, how over 50% of dogs and cats die from cancer and that this was not true years ago. Having lost Poochie to cancer and being involved with the wonderful organization Canine Cancer Awareness, I read about what actually goes into pet food and was horrified. Then realized what goes into us and was even further horrified. Reducing our meat consumption was starting to sound like a good idea.
Now I’m off to make tea and snuggle with two sick little girls.
Clearly also needs to do a much better job of making sure there aren’t so many homeless youth to begin with.
But at this stage in the game, there is little doubt (at least in my mind) that marriage will ultimately open up to include people of the same sex, and that this evolutionary advance will affect every area of family law and every nook and cranny of community life. If gay men can now get married in Iowa, nothing can stop it. It’s like a strapping, corn-fed freight train, roaring wholesomely past the amber waves of grain and purple mountain majesties on its way to the coastal American Sodoms. It’s Iowa that is delivering same-sex marriage to San Francisco and New York, not the other way around. The old American image of the family is being carried away; a new one is coming over the horizon, but we’re not there yet. The journey is changing us—all of us, Red and Blue alike—in ways that no one could anticipate.
Now, on to the announcement. You may have noticed that earlier in the post I sad winners. Yes, winners. Linda was so excited about the number of people entered she wanted to give away two books! So without further stalling the winners are...
William is Senior Advanced Marketing Counsel at Securian Financial Group in St. Paul, Minn. Bill assists advisors with business, estate and retirement strategies. He writes advanced marketing material, teaches advanced marketing schools and visits firms to present materials and products. He also develops executive compensation, business planning and estate planning strategies.
One morning while I was there I caught part of a TV book programme that practically made me want to emigrate. Umberto Eco and Jean-Claude Carrière were being interviewed about a book they had written together called N'espérez pas vous débarrasser des livres. My French is far from perfect but I did understand Professor Eco to say that if Robinson Crusoe had been stranded on his island with some form of e-reader, his battery would have run out within hours, whereas the Bible he had with him kept him going for 21 years!
At that point, the raid gave up on me getting the rest of my foci, and wiped out the instance without looking back. I felt like an unimportant idiot. Mostly, I felt extremely disappointed.
Open every link on every page. Pre-shop the sale, deciding if it’s worth it. Those that are, copy-paste the street address into a blank text file. Once we were done, we pasted the entire list into DrivingRoutePlanner.com. It figured out the shortest route to go to all the sales [it was an odd figure-8-ish beast]. It printed directions. (And made a GPX file for GPSs that support them.)
This was not the best day to visit the Cathedral, which has just begun a year’s worth of digging up and renovation. It means that half the church is not accessible and the sound of pneumatic drills is only interrupted by the daily service! Let’s hope they find something of value when the builders let the archaeologists in for a look around…
“Wait. What?! No. How did I get here?! Why am I here?!” I said, confused and angry.
Dried oregano- 1.2 tsp (optional)
There I am, standing in a sea of 9 – 16 year olds (something I haven’t done since schooldays!). There’s a buzz in the room as the crowd wait impatiently for the celebrated author to arrive. As I gaze around me I’m struck at how little girls have really changed “since I were a lass”. There’s the same self conscious behaviour, the same brittle confidence, the same embarrassment at parents.
The final breakdown on price:
In the Old Testament book of Joshua there is an interesting passage in chapter 24. Joshua had just addressed the people of Israel – reminding them of their past and casting a vision for their future. He warned them of what would happen if they stopped following God and started following other “gods” in the land they had newly conquered. In response, the people all said, “We will serve the Lord!” Then came the interesting part about the rock.
After a nice walk along the Singapore East Coast Park seafront, we hopped over to East Coast Lagoon Food Village to have our dinner. There are many varieties of food to choose and I walked for around 2 rounds before deciding what to eat. If I am not mistaken, there are at least 40 to 50 stalls here selling a wide range of hawker food.
Post of the day comes from reader “The Observer” with this comment of the day last week:
Allow to cool for 10 minutes, and enjoy!
On that road to Damascus, Saul did not need to be told of his physical blindness. Knowing the reality of Jesus Christ, he also needed no one to convince him of his sin of disobedience. That, no doubt, is the basic problem today. People fail to understand the reality of Jesus Christ. He is more than a prophet; more than a prime example of godliness. He is the only mediator between God and man for no man comes to the Father but through Him. Because He is the only Saviour, He is God as He said in Isaiah 43:11,
Sailor's Delight was a real surprise for me. I told Pam I thought it would clash horribly with my skin and I'd probably end up giving it away. Sorry girls, once I tried it on it's stash status was sealed! I'm happy to report this looks fantastic on me!!! A vivid orange jelly - that skirts close to the redder side of orange life - with gold flecky shimmer/glitter. I think this was still just 2 coats and though there is a little VNL, in person it looked fine. The bottle did need a wee shake because some of the gold likes to sink to the bottom, but it refloated easily.
Earn 10 Extra Opportunities
But at school, I was retarded. I looked funny. I read books and talked to animals, sometimes preferring their company to those half-bald primates that walk upon two legs. I watched nature and science documentaries with as much attention and interest as I did cartoons. One of my friends was the girl with muscular dystrophy who walked funny. As a whelp, this hypocrisy made even less sense than it does now when recollecting it. All I knew was it hurt.
Thursday: Zoo field trip with James and his class. Does this count as a workout? James thought so...
Here's another one where I put my ring next to it so you can see the final size of the carpet...
Pearse Doherty:
Remember this kid? She's four, now, and it turns out four is a blast (and we had a kickass Wordgirl party...honestly, whoever thought up Wordgirl deserves a giant smooch. Lady Redundant Woman? Sigh.). Remember this, when our other sweet daughter was born? She's almost two and a half and she is such a clever sneak. Two and four are such great, cuddly ages and they are each other's dearest friends. Just had to mention that.
stay tuned for more winter charm.
Her phone vibrated in her pocket she opened it.
David: Like beat people, and kill them, and make them prisoners.
This workshop focused on figure work completed within 1/2 day or a whole day — alla prima. It was good for me to delve in deeper to search for nuances of value, tone, and temperature under the instruction of a master.
My story “Fly”, published in Elements of the Soul, struck a different kind of emotion in readers. Some say it was very sad, others say it was hopeful. But the judges said I won because I made them feel.
I've been mulling this one since Day Uno of Adnoxious, trying to decide whether it's the ultimate example of a television message perfectly executed and incisively delivered, or whether everyone involved in its creation needs to immediately put down whatever they're doing, bid their loved ones adieu, and check themselves into a psychiatric hospital.
Thank-you Janette AND Mennonite Girls! :)
I love gratitude hops. They give me a chance to share even MORE of my books with reader friends.
14 Tool Shed - The Wave
586 D-VII/4/1969. “On the Retirement of Mertha Fulkerson as Manager of The Clearing.” The Clearing, Ellison Bay, Wisconsin.
Because for some reason they connect with me
I had to transport my mom from the hospital back to the nursing home since Medicare won't pay to transport her since she can "sit up". Crazy! She seems to be more alert so I am hoping to see something positive when I stop by there today AFTER my first day of work TODAY!! I don't have to go in until 10 so I thought I would do a quick post this morning!
Another growth market is the training and exercise of children. This small, transportable device is great for taking into schools and youth groups for the same reasons as above and the fact that Hyperwear’s education has a huge “Play” aspect that children and adults can’t help but to warm to, smile and generally have fun.
1. Ophelia London- http://bit.ly/H85lyO – I picked Ophelia’s blog because I had loved her Audrey Hepburn photo. I also just love Ophelia’s name!
and down,
What a difference! I think it's a shame they did'nt keep the football pitch though as there is not many places to have a kickabout when the park is full which it often gets on days with decent weather but you can't have it all I suppose.
The day of the surgery started off badly. We arrived at the ward for 7.30, to hear staff complaining about Mr Vakis ( surgeon ) taking a Saturday surgery. We weren't allowed to use the ward toilets as we were not classed as a patient until we were in a bed. The anaesthetist called me at 9 a.m. to complete paper work and to tell me there's no beds, but not to panic.
I hope you all have a lovely Tuesday! I'm hoping Jeremy will come in for the big win on Biggest Loser...though I'm sure Kim will win.
“Wave goodbye to your friends.” Goodbye??? It sounded so final, but as instructed, I waved to my friends and other spectators one last time as they chanted my name from the viewing platform. Then I turned to the camera that was documenting my final moments, blew one last kiss to my friends and said a quick prayer…just in case!
The above mentioned amount makes about 5 medium sized patties as well.
No. The rules stipulated in the Ten Commandments lead to the good life, not a so-called “liberation” from the Commandments. All people are sinful, and so all people experience problems in their lives, including Christians. But those problems cannot be alleviated by throwing away God’s rules for human living. Quite to the contrary, in fact. Biblical morality is a sure guide to the good life. The happiness promised by the Sexual Revolution is a fraud. Surely that should be apparent by now. (“NO RULES, NO CIVILIZATION: The Sexual Revolution left us free . . . to be Miserable”)
Brew 1 pot of strongly (or double)-brewed coffee. Bring to room temperature.
wary, a hare nudges
1. I simply haven’t had the time because I’ve been studying my ass off.
2) The Set Up
Wattol Forlie was fired by the Earth administration for complaining about how the locals were being treated. He writes to Signatory Synvoret about the goings on led by Earth Commissioner Par-Chavorlem. Synvoret is sent to Earth to investigate.
They thrust their arms up in the air and smile crazily as they take off, racing forward toward toddlerhood.
Geraldine Page (The Pope of Greenwich Village)
So there you are, fellow bloggers. You have been warned. This blogging business will do you no good. And it seems that – so rumour has it – that Sei Shonagon was eventually dismissed from the court and died a lonely old lady.
3) Manage my finances better.
the field trip permission slip i looked hours for in February
Many Wiccans follow in their core Raymond Buckland, Robert Cochrane, Alex Sanders, Scott Cunningham or any other initiators of what is today modern Wicca. I would ask them – how many have actually doubted in what they read from their books? If you recall, in their books, they too only interpreted what they had heard, collected, researched on. Reading that article, I felt as if adding anything to the knowledge you’ve read from people before you is sacred. Like texts in Bible – they must be copied without doubt or you’ll face the rage of your people! Isn’t it strange? Fearing to doubt those that come before us.
Round 17: (Knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together) repeat brackets across round, knit 2 stitches on the end. (10 stitches)
Oh Geez, I hope you all never experience designer block.....LOL After 3 days of working on this card it's still not what I had visioned but I decided to go ahead and post it anyway. Far cry from posting as I had hoped but I did get 4 DT May cards done for CCAYR.
It was against this backdrop that the 7th Platoon of G Company, of the second battalion of Scots Guards unit of the British Army, belied its centuries-long reputation for honour. On Dec 12, 1948, under the leadership of Sgt Charles Douglas, the Guards surrounded a rubber estate near Batang Kali, Selangor. Looking for Communist guerillas who habitually moved in and out of the local population, they shot and killed 24 ethnic Chinese villagers before razing the village.
My dad once said, when I asked him about death and the afterlife, that "If you try to make a heaven of Earth, you'll have nothing to worry about."
Jesse: Well…I’m glad it’s good for something.
After making fun of a methhead who didn't know how to get through the glass to sit down and several men wearing suit jackets with jeans (Andy votes no, I vote yes, it's totes okay), we finally boarded the plane to Vegas.
“But if Africans objected to being colonised by Europeans, then Europeans have the same right to object to being colonised by Africa or the Third World, which is exactly what is happening with current Third World immigration levels into Britain and all western nations,” he said.
The government’s proposed Household Charge of €100 is the forerunner for water charges and a property tax on every home. A pensioner or low paid worker pays the same as a millionaire. How rotten! This new tax has absolutely nothing to do with improving council services – the proceeds go towards the bailout of wealthy gamblers and bankers, for which ordinary people are being bled dry.
May 1 marks the traditional celebration of Beltane — a “purification ceremony and celebration of newness” (Laura Bruno). So, tomorrow, May 1 offers us the opportunity to turn an energetic “new leaf” for our planet and our selves. On May 1, we join to heal the core of our planetary illness. This will be the first step in “Oceans Eleven-Eleven”– A virtual gathering of “expert lovers and healers” who can get behind the scenes and heal our self destructive patterns of fear, doubt and worry. Much like the movie “Ocean’s 11,” this group of people understands the system and can use energy to repair what it wrong with it. In the movie, George Clooney and gang stole from a corrupt casino. In our real world, we’ll be taking it a step further to put an end to that corruption.
Ultimately, the only thing this game has going for it is how pretty everything is. Without the terrible, broken gameplay elements it might have managed to be a slightly below-par visual novel but, as it is, this game is nothing but a string of facepalm moments. 2/10.
Be sure to check out the other Friday Fun Chicks.
I also made a landscape sketch, in hope that I would give me a sense of how I was going to do the background of the drawing above.
The card is for a little girl for her First Holy Communion in two weeks time. I will add her name to it later. Head over to the Mojo Monday blog for plenty of inspiration.
"Yeah," he admitted.
Marathon will take you there!
Dawn - Life on the East Coast
I remember an elder saying , " you know you have reached the status of an 'elder' when you think the world is going to Hell in a hand cart". Yes. Well. Just go into your local big box store and ask where the hand carts are.
Inks: Memento Tuxedo Black
I accept that it is easy to indulge in a bit of ‘Police bashing’ – and sometimes, as the G20 police behaviour demonstrates, they deserve it – but this action on the part of the police was doomed to failure right from the start and just plain daft. I suspect a jury would have acquitted had it gone the full distance…. the CPS certainly thought so.
wouldn’t I want to find out?
I've just cut one of the bestest bits from my novel. Three thousand words from chapter one. Three thousand words I've poured over, changed round, added to, taken out, put back in and now - boof - they're gone forever. Their crime? They didn't move the plot forward. But they are saved in my brilliantly named 'Stuff cut out' folder, just in case.
They met with the Big Boss... the Director of Oriflame Norway..
Enemies
Kirsten Powers – whom I almost ALWAYS disagree with – is a consistent feminist who was appalled at the vicious treatment that conservative women such as Sarah Palin have received from the liberal establishment.
- Danny Cox
About Sumner Manufacturing Co., Inc.:
The figures are for the fiscal year that ends March 31, 2011. In addition, the government has spent $6.4-million to “provide dedicated resources to the investigation and disruption of human smuggling networks.” Almost half that amount went to the RCMP while the rest was spent by the CBSA, Privy Council, Foreign Affairs and National Defence.
Where exactly do you think this whirlwind romance takes place? According to MapQuest, it takes 24 hours or less to drive from Tulsa from just about anywhere in the continental United States. For example, San Diego and Miami are less than 24 hours from Tulsa.
This recipe was passed on from my mother's generation.
Yes, twice. First to a publisher who was quite positive about my writing but felt this story wasn't right for them. I also tried an agency and was told they weren't taking new clients (despite their website giving submission details - grrr). I'd previously tried to get an agent for my other novels and never got anything other than a standard reject (sometimes not even that) and had begun to lose heart a little.
Hopefully it will look something like this...
Contestant: Barcelona.
I couldn't pass up using one of my favorite giraffe stamps I have had forever! My sister gave it to me one year for my birthday. I love how primitive it looks, but how much life and movement it shows.
I got the idea for making a sour dough starter from a Twitter pal named "Finn". He started tweeting about his sourdough starter dying and having to start a new one. I got curious and asked him if a very infrequent non-baker such as myself could create a sour dough starter and only use it once and a while? He said yes. Finn claimed that sour dough starter took little to no time to take care of and was worth it.
Yes, I know that USATF hired former hurdler Benita Fitgerald Mosely as Chief of Sport Performance. However, and no disrespect to Ms. Mosely, I’m talking about star quality, clout – someone that could become a mover and shaker within the sport. I’m talking about an Edwin Moses, Evelyn Ashford, Carl Lewis, Michael Johnson type “legend” – someone whose name and accomplishments are on par with Bubka, Coe and Juantorena. In short an athlete whose name alone would give them instant respect.
This month's Sketch challenge is sponsor by the wonderful In2Stamps company and we are so happy to have some of their DT joining us this month. The winner of this challenge will receive 10,00 euro gift voucher to spend at the store.
Why did I choose this one first, and what did I think? Well, I chose it, I think, because after my brother was diagnosed as bipolar in 1991, my mother started learning more about this disease. Patty Duke was one of the first celebrities that I had ever heard also being bipolar, and she has been quite outspoken about it since her diagnosis in 1982. When my brother was diagnosed, I did contemplate learning more about it then, but my plate was full, or so I thought, and I left it up to my mom to handle things.
Two boneless Salmon portions
Warranty issues and manufacturer restrictions prevent us from shipping certain products to all geographical locations. In addition, some items too big to ship to a P.O. box must be shipped to a street address. You’ll be notified while placing your order if we’re unable to ship specific items to the address you’ve selected. Below are some general guidelines for items shipped by Amazon.com to the following destinations:
Populated with new faces as well as familiar ones, Richelle Mead's breathtaking Bloodlines series explores all the friendship, romance, battles, and betrayals that made the #1 New York Times bestselling Vampire Academy series so addictive. In this second book, the drama is hotter, the romances are steamier, and the stakes are even
A. Viewing good work and seeing different ways of storytelling is essential to our process. Whether it’s a full-length documentary, photo essay, text piece, graphic or oral history, we are always looking for ways to build on our storytelling skills.
2 amongst
60 ml mango pulp (I used tin mango pulp)
300) aunt and uncle visiting again today, seeing my mum and her sister enjoying catching up and being together
I am working again, thankfully three days a week, semi-retired. I am away from home for twelve hours each day I go to work. Those days feel very long for a tired old sod like me.
Here's a cocktail that is both beautiful and intoxicating, so be careful - they are so nice looking and festive, that you might forget to sip!
And of course
Wish me luck this week, because my patients will need it.
Ps. Don’t neglect the mango pancakes, a special treat! My boyfriend gobbled down two the other day!
Pours a very dark orange with a slight creamy/tan head. Not much lacing down the side of the glass, but what was left was expected. Not a bad tasting beer, not a great tasting beer. It was right down the middle. This doppelbock was very sweet with caramel, cocoa and maybe some molasses (which is why I will give it a 3, not a big fan of molasses).
This past weekend, Chris and I split up painting duties. It was such a beautiful weekend that we could both be outside painting. He was priming our next project while I was putting layer upon layer upon layer of beautiful white paint on these bad boys. I'd paint them, sand them down some, and paint them again. I really wanted them to be a bright white and have a smooth finish. I finished up with a coat of minwax's water based polycrylic. It's the only top coat I'll use for white painted furniture. It goes on and dries clear without yellowing the piece like typical polyurethanes do.
04/03/08
To get us through the next couple of months͵ I will have a series of deals to get you off the couch ͵ doing a bit of exercise and making your way to Deveney's of Dundrum...
And I’ve said many times before how there seems to be a media ban on even discussing the topic in Anchorage; though, Juneau’s media covered it in depth, and therefore had it removed.
Being a mom has been the most humbling experience I have ever known. Tommy lights up our life. His laughter, his wildness, his constant invitations to play, how he lives so alive and vibrantly at this age - all of that makes us want to be more than we are.
If Lee Seung Gi wishes to seriously pursue his career as an actor after boldly setting down variety, he needs to change. He shouldn’t just think he ‘failed because it was an unlikeable character’, but he needs to look over whether he can find any fault in his acting and how he should overcome his limits.
This is why not having the most recent release by Ms. Pamela feels as though I am missing out on the newest adventure of the Ferals.
Remember your connection. It’s always there, as are those who walk with you. Just stopping to take a deep breath and bring your true self back from panic or frenetic activity is a sacred act.
It has been well over a month since my last post :-(. I've been crafting, but just can't find the time to get projects posted. I'm hoping to find more time to participate in all the great challenges out there.
Impossible that I would be sitting at this computer, typing about this topic.
As for me, I think I'll just have a good cry.
Over the years, I have taught in discrimination training that we deal with each other at four levels: fear, tolerance, acceptance, and unconditional love. Each of these emotional states is impacted by the factors set forth above. What other fears might we have about each other? Most fear is born out of ignorance. How can we educate ourselves to ameliorate those fears? How can we facilitate an engaging dialogue about new and old at our organizations? How do we understand that all of us have more in common than we do that is different? For example, many senior leaders have fears/concerns about the work ethic of the Millennials. Is that justified? Are there any facts to support it? Likewise many Millennials and GenXers value life/balance as much if not more than career success. Are they right to be concerned about/fear senior employees that exhibit what they perceive to be work/life imbalance? Tolerance is the second level where we deal with one another. In a sense, we’ll do you no harm because you’re different from us. This is essentially what the law mandates. In these rapidly changing times, age and experience seem to have less significance in the marketplace, generating age discrimination claims. Fact is, a company shall do no harm because of one’s age but does not have to tolerate a lack of performance or lack of engagement into an emerging culture. Senior employees can’t be viewed as pulling up the rear. They have to set the example of constant improvement- a willingness to be open to new ideas.
In the spirit of National “I Told Ya So” Day…here is my Christmas Eve Post from 2009. Enjoy, and Merry Christmas to all!
18) NIGHT FRIGHT – Rene Hall
I’m really grateful to the Jeremy Redmond who had the vision to record “Let It Rise” in a new and fresh way. What a humbling experience to see God’s favor on something – it really has had nothing to do with me – it’s all God.
onion celery
03. When She Comes Around
Frank Zappa- Joe’s Garage
There was also a booth with these beautiful oriental watercolor paintings by Samuel Kim. The one that caught our eye was the two bluebirds - the others I found on his website (click on the picture for a direct link).
1 attainment
Because it was ‘live TV’ and no recordings have been in circulation since the series aired in 1974, Media Circus has been all but forgotten. I hope this video will help it to regain a measure of the attention and respect it deserves as one of the most critically sophisticated mainstream media programs ever produced.
- My wife says: This show is funny but rude.
On that day Joshua took Makkedah, and struck it and its king with the edge of the sword. He utterly destroyed them – all the people who were in it. He let none remain. He also did to the king of Makkedah as he had done to the king of Jericho.
- 93% go online traditionally via their PCs, while 76% access the web via their cell phones
I started the video with this hope that if we treat death in an irreverent manner, there would be none of this clinging to 'Dignity'. I felt a lot of the rhetoric surrounding the rallying cry for people in support of assisted dying / suicide lands on this notion of 'going out with grace' and 'on your own terms'. And I thought, okay, if we can joke about it, see some macabre humour in this, perhaps we might start to question the Fairness of this Vanity (the Vanity Fair?). Yes, I do think demanding dignity with your death is a form of vanity that punishes the people around you.
(2) Footwear: Wear comfortable shoes that are easy to run in and won’t give you blisters. If possible, wear water-proof shoes. (There is a chance of showers tomorrow in NYC.) Don’t wear open-toe shoes.
The second test went really well; he breathed steadily on his own for an hour. The nurse encouraged us to keep being patient because Sam needed time to exercise his lungs, little by little.
The water plantain is a very ordinary and “plain” plant, not showy at all, or expensive. Here we see it not in a costly or elaborate pot, but in an ordinary clay pot or crock, and that crock is even broken. So the poverty of this hokku is easy to see.
Really? The worst ever? I don’t know about that.
Millions of people whose lives have never been changed believe themselves to be born-again because we have so reduced the gospel to a decision that will only take 5 minutes of their time.
UPDATED (As of 7AM, Wednesday) Despite the High Court’s decision allowing her to leave the country, former President Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo was prevented by Immigration authorities to board her flight Tuesday night. Immigration officials said they were just following orders from Chief Justice Leila De Lima.
By Lesli A. Maxwell on May 11, 2012 2:30 PM
Naturally Mr. Campbell has a store of reminiscences. He was the first tax collector of the county when it included all fo the present Brooks, Berrien , Lowndes, Clinch and Echols counties. This was in 1836, and the taxes amounted to $332. He also participated in the Indian fight here in July, 1836, when the Creek Indians passed through here in their attempt to join the Seminoles in Florida. He tells of an encounter with an Indian in that fight. It was a running skirmish through the woods and he became detached from his party. Suddenly his horse shied and he discovered an Indian behind a tree. The Indian attempted to shoot him, but the gun only snapped. Dismounting, he approached the Indian, slowly raising his gun to his shoulder. He said if the Indian had begged for his life he intended to spare him, but the man stood quite still, clinched his teeth and looked him in the eyes with no sign of surrender, so he shot him. At that time this country, now so populous and cultivated, was virgin forests ans was overrun with bears and deer, ans well as Indians. In his hardy, outdoor life, Mr. Campbell contracted rheumatism when a very young man, and could not stand erect for several years. He heard of a doctor who gave steam baths for rheumatism, but being unable to go to him, he treated himself. He dug a pit and burned oak and hickory wood to coals - as for a barbecue. Over the pit he laid stout green poles and covered them with every herb he had ever heard of as possessing curative properties. Stripped of clothing, he wrapped himself in a heavy blanket and laid down on this, which, of course, induced heavy perspiration. After six or seven treatments he was practically cured, and has never been so badly afflicted with it since.
Jim Twardowski, RN, is a travel writer based in New Orleans.
The JCHR found no tangible evidence of the government giving due consideration to the UK’s obligations under the UNCRPD during this critical reforming time.
"Ahhh… love will be the death of us, Rudie," I said, shaking my head.
I posted a casual note on Facebook today, saying that an article had been accepted for publication. Within an hour, I had over twenty "likes". I am not sure how to interpret it. Had friends given up hope that I would ever be accepted? (No, I think they were sincerely enthusiastic).
6. These socks allow one to have the sockless look while absorbing enough sweat as to avoid having smelly shoes and feet. They also provide more warmth than true sockless wear, allowing one to go "sockless" even in cold weather.
Of course, all the ladies were going nuts over the singing priests, but it still wasn't enough, so something had to be done. Thus, they started inventing some new and crazy batshit insane musical instruments. One of them is the trumpet, which of course you know, except this one was in a more primitive form, without any valves and stuff like that. Another one was the lute, you know the thing that looks like a guitar and it makes that "tmgdgmnmdgmtmndmn" sound. Other than that, they invented three more special instruments: the harpsichord (that piano that seems to have several broken Ming dinasty vases between its chords), the organ and the hurdy gurdy:
Depending on how your page is formatted, look for Add a Gadget in blue..
legs are getting more and more tan. I call him my candy corn. His face still has hardly any pigment, his tummy is a little darker and his legs are darkest.
Sucking the life out of
ObjectFrontier (OFS) helps software companies and software-enabled businesses to design, develop, test, and maintain their software products and applications, whether they are hosted, licensed, or mobile. OFS is based in Atlanta and has offices in New York, Washington DC, Philadelphia, and offshore in India and the Philippines. Our clients are Independent Software Vendors (ISVs) and F1000 companies whose revenues are driven primarily by customer-facing software products. We have earned the trust of clients in such industries as healthcare, financial services, publishing, hospitality, and insurance and have partnered with them for years.
I’m surprised not to see Gillespie and I by Jane Harris, simply because it’s had strong recommendations from other bloggers. The shortlist does seem to have gone for what I considered the top half of the longlist, broadly speaking. Now that the list is more manageable (and the distractions of the ones that didn’t appeal are removed) I think I’ll have a bash at getting through the lot before the winner is announced.
View the works of local artists while enjoying purchased wines and $5 appetizers at monthly wine tasting.Price: Drink specials, happy hour costs vary.Vincenzo’s Grill at St. Petersburg Marriott Clearwater
The Khmer Rouge forced around two million people from the cities to the country to take up work in the agricultural field.
However, there was a link to Translation's website at the bottom of his email. I followed this link, and found a client list that included Coors among a list of reputable companies such as P&G and Johnson & Johnson.
Although components of urine are extracted to create a number of topical creams and fertility drugs, the drinking of urine is not generally accepted by the Western medical establishment.
Forget it.
And then my clone went back to whence he came.
Challenge #11 has been set by our lovely Liz and it's a nice easy one for you too...
and then he attempted a dinosaur puzzle.
I'll be reading up over the summer, trying to find something I like better for the fall. Judy Moody and Ruby Lu aren't off the list entirely, and I need to read the new Abigail Iris. We'll see.
I got the Marvel “1602″ graphic novel for Christmas this year. It is Neil Gaiman’s first comic series in a while. He was just about to start a project, then 911 happened. He didn’t want any planes, skyscrapers, or guns. So he moved all the Marvel characters to England/Europe in 1602.
So here is a quick up date!
And in that instant I’m in the same situation as this guy walking away from me, and at the same time very far away. I’m on the edge, scraping for what I can to make rent in two weeks. Yet I’m one good interview away from health, dental, 401K and a steady check. It’s a strange life we sometimes live.
What I want to try and do this afternoon through a few words and some singing we’ll do together later, is remind us all that there is indeed abundant and everlasting life to be had. There is a crown to win. There is peace and contentment and joy and rest and comfort and feasting and delight, and whole storehouses of perfection to be enjoyed in God’s good heaven. But the only way to get there, and I mean the only way to get there, is through violence. Violence to our sin, violence to the flesh, violence to the reigning philosophies and ideologies of our day — what the Bible calls “the world” — violence, as Jesus said, even to heaven. My aim is to call us all back to the battle, where we are to face certain death, sure. But where by God’s grace, from the ground there blossoms red, life that shall endless be.
If you're making these for the first time, I would suggest halving the recipe like I did. I got about 16 candies and that is plenty for our house. They are pretty sweet little bites- you usually only need one (or half of one) to satisfy your sweet tooth.
“It’s June,” she doesn’t quite believe him.
Chef:No of course not..
broiled lobster tails and claws with drawn butter
Unleashing a chain of events,
I know I've mentioned it before - my plan for the A - Z Blogfest - but today is the day I actually tell you that the theme I've chosen is the phonetic alphabet, as taught to me by my ex who served as a Marine. I remember him teaching me the words at night, like a littany...Alpha, Bravo, Charlie, Delta, Echo, Foxtrot, Gulf, Hotel, India, Juliette, Kilo, Lima, Mike, November, Oscar, Romeo, Sierra, Tango, Uniform, Victor, Whiskey, Yankee, Zulu. It may not look exciting at first glance, but hopefully, you'll learn some interesting stuff you might not have known.
I know some people didn't like this stuff very much and prices tanked a little in Beckett recently, but i've gotten a few nice cards and think its worth the gamble.
The Incans started to carve a kings face into the side of the mountains before the dirty Spaniards came and they had to flee (can you tell I'm a little upset with the Spaniards?). Anyway, you can see this eyes and nose, and part of his crown. I don't know if the grainery to the right was going to factor into the carving or not.
Now, let's say I'm trying to eat healthier and actively seeking a good for me meal at Panera and McDonald's without looking at the nutrition guides on their websites. So, looking at their menus (I did not cherry pick here, I chose these meals by what sounded healthiest and what I would like to eat, except at Panera I chose turkey, which I hate and will not eat, but turkey is the best for you meat either restaurant carries.) I chose 2 grilled chicken wraps and a side garden fresh salad. At Panera, I chose the half smoked turkey sandwich and the half orchard harvest chicken salad. My McDonald's meal totals 570 calories, 21g of fat, 1240mg of sodium and 64g of carbohydrates. My Panera meal totals 740 calories, 25g of fat, 1930mg of sodium and 84g of carbohydrates. If you somehow don't eat the baguette that shows up on your tray at Panera you still get 560 calories, 24g of fat, 1490mg of sodium and 52g of carbohydrates. Panera loses in all categories except carbohydrates if you don't eat the bread, but be honest with yourself, you're going to eat that baguette.
I always love to loved ones
Flock of Seagulls Wishing (I had a photograph of you) UK
Although they were arrested and taken to a police station, the officers there refused to register them because the practice of free sex with prostitutes - known in police circles as 'num-num' - was common.
And in an effort to share my honest experiences, and in pursuit of healing, I've decided to be brutally honest here.
“Look, it's a fresh spike!” He said holding it up, “Now stop being such a drama queen and get 'em out!”
Lily Quilt
Sure enough she has a really bad home life. How could it be? How could someone not care enough about this child? Without going into great detail, neglect is the case. I felt as if the wind had been knocked out of me. Why? Because this was not in Africa, or India, or Guatemala...this was in my own backyard. This was personal. As I am just going about my business, here is a precious child like my little girl, that may have circumstances that most people in Western Civilization will never deal with.
My success in the challenge on this, my writing blog, is more debatable. The decision to publish a series of short stories didn’t go down as well as I’d initially hoped, but has led me to a decision to continue with the series towards publication, so that’s all good. It’s funny how life nudges you like that. Due to some problems domestically, I struggled to maintain any momentum for writing blog posts in the later weeks of the month – for this blog only. My A-Z postings were intermittent, and reasonably random in subject matter. Despite that, I consider the whole A-Z Blogging Challenge a huge success for me personally, as through it I found both a few more readers, and some worthwhile blogs which have gone onto my own follow / RSS feed lists.There were also many writers on the A-Z Challenge, and it was interesting for all to see the themes and how each blogger attempted to maintain their blogging through the month.
Working with a small press/hybrid like Evolved has opened my eyes to the complexities of publishing, and educated me no end.
Oh, I do know what it is like to be faced with dire circumstances. I do know what is it like to be a parent and to love and to live a simple life in devotion to God. Being a parent is the most rewarding gift any species can experience and for a human it is an opportunity to infuse unconditional love at every step and stage into another person. As a parent to a child you gave birth to, or a child you have adopted or came with the person you have relations with brings both hardships and rewards. Before you became a parent, love did not have the same meaning. Parenthood is when many people figure out what unconditional love means, but not all people have to be parents to know this. This ability to love for the sake of loving with no expectation of any acknowledgement or shared emotion returned is the purest form of love. When you love your child, you love everything there is about your child; the good and the bad; you can overlook the bad because your heart is filled with devotion, compassion, and love that fills your entire being.
Christmas vacation has come to a screeching hault and we have come to grips with the fact that we now have to wake up before noon. I don't think I am ever going to outgrow "sleeping in." I love sleep so much, I am sure one day that will end. Anyways, we are back into our routine. I go to school and Alex works on anything from writing a discipleship manual, filming videos for our One More Friend Gathering, working on our Leadership Training curriculum, reading, and soon to be working on courses towards his credentials, etc. I no longer have to teach 3rd grade science, love the kids, hate being in a classroom, it was a thorn in my side.
The RCMP makes male and female recruits pass the same baseline physical tests. Proponents for a more multicultural force say that anything lost in brute force would be made up in empathy, language skills and the ability to reach out to cultural communities.
But it’s not just South Central that’s a war zone as a result of mass immigration. The war zone seems to extend all over the country, especially where blacks and Hispanics confront each other.
Since I don't have the time or energy to download photos to catch up on what's been going on the past few weekends, I thought I would just focus on me for a moment. What is going on with me.
I just spent an hour Googling “Welts from Humira.” That’s the shot I have to take, now that I’ve been diagnosed with my weirdo auto-immune disorder. I’m not quite sure what the fuck is happening around here but I’m having a hard time keeping up. All of a sudden I was in the hospital, then I was receiving a slew of gifts and flowers, then everyone I ever met was calling me, then my dad flew to L.A., then I was diagnosed, then I was released, then I was on disability, then my mom flew to L.A., then everyone was gone and I was left with some semblance of a life I had created pre-hospital and it is this life I’ve been floundering in ever since.
Target has a great deal on frozen chicken. They have 2.5 lb bags of frozen chicken breasts and frozen chicken tenders for only $3.39! This may not be at every store but worth keeping an eye out for. The register even printed out a $1.00 off frozen chicken coupon when I checked out so I can get another bag for $2.39!
Still overeating anyway:- Well I know that I’m less likely to overeat if I do not restrict AT ALL. i.e if I want a meatball sub, I should go get a meatball sub, because if I don’t I’m likely to overeat more later for denying myself something.
This makes things interesting, because this then makes it difficult for you to take money for any good thing. I mean, if a thing is judged very 'good' by you, you value it less in terms of money. So the 'better' something is (i.e., the more worthwhile), the less money it's worth.
Want the whole background story of your character? Read my books, To Kill A Warlock, just .99 ebook! and A Tale of Two Goblins (Also available in paperback)
6. Is it easier now to face other challenges in your professional or personal life? If yes, why?
You’re also helping humans. Yes, you heard that right.
Or prison.
was there, in her coffin, holding a beautiful white rose in her hand with the photo of the little boy
I think I must need a break. I didn't know I needed one. I got busy and I took one, quite on accident. But it felt so liberating. I haven't blogged, or facebooked, or tweeted for a bit more than a week. Instead, I've rollerskated, scootered, jogged, shot a few free throws, and played tennis with two little people that are getting rather big while I've had my nose in the computer. I've written a couple of letters (real paper and pen letters) and read more than a few books (current obsession-Emerson's essays). I've graded term papers and written letters or recommendation for several of my stellar students. (Here's hoping they get into grad school-they all deserve it.) I got caught up in the beauty and sweetness of the Royal Wedding. I've done the NYT crossword puzzle every day, and get this-my Quiet Man has done it with me with his own copy. That hasn't happened since we were dating, so you know, Kate and William don't have the monopoly on burnin' love, baby. (By the way, I can still smoke him on crossword puzzles,and he can still smoke me on pretty much everything else in the world, so not much has changed with 16 years of matrimony.) I called my sister Leslie three times this week. That's a record. I shed a suprising amount of tears when the Office said good-bye to Michael Scott. What a great boss he turned out to be, as Jim mentioned. And I mopped, dusted, and pretty much sanitized my house. The closets are next. I'm after you, hoardish, gypsy, cluttery clutter. You can run but you can't hide.This has turned out to be a pretty good break.
Let’s take a look at the evidence. What if we were to take what Google says literally and create a web site around their declared principles? This is nothing new. The clues as to what Google want are all there. We just thought we could take short cuts and ignore the want for high quality and substance. Well, it worked for a while as I most certainly know. The problem is the fact that this can be no approach to develop a web site, and certainly no technique to build a long-term organization.
Now as valentine's has past i wanted to create a card that followed the DT theme but also wasn't lovey dovey well... it kinda went wrong there!!! haha!!! I've used some gorjuss basic grey papers and some cute little heart brads with some gorjuss prima blooms!!! and a huge big brown bow to finish!
I hope everyone had a great weekend and stay tuned…………………………….
It should be noted that the padrones are incomplete sources for reconstructing the jail populations of Quito, but by 18th c. standards they’re pretty damn good. The padrones were not part of a modern drive to statistically know population (following Foucault), but rather were a function of the judicial state’s commitment to, well, the production of paper. Formulaic constructions are a hallmark of the judicial state’s paper production, which in the 18th c. reached epic proportions. Of course, the judges were keeping track of their workload in part, but the padrones could also be used to track the effectiveness of the alguacil mayor.
Dear Helene:
10. Where do you go when you need to get away?
She is also a connoisseur of fine foods. No burritos for her. Her day usually starts with a cup of tea and her toast and Vegemite. She also has a penchant for pasta and baked beans. If it's on our plates, she thinks it's good dog tucker.
I hope you have a wonderful weekend. Thanks for dropping by. I'd love to hear any comments you'd like to leave.
Welcome aboard the crazy 2010 train. A mere 10 years after the world was going to end (1999) and just two years before the next so called destruction of mother earth (2012), New Years Day has now become a bigger drinking day than the fabled night before. Is that any way to keep a New Years resolution? Assuming of course that your resolution was to eat better and drink less, and that all time dreaded word, e x e r c i s e. Instead there are beer events galore for even the most beeriest of geeks. Lambics at the Tap And Table, Stouts at Monks, Anniversary parties at Local 44. What ever happened to staying at home and sleeping on the couch while pretending to watch football? Is nothing sacred anymore?
David Michael Smith (Green) 256
Sports journalists have always had to walk the line of being friends or fans of the team and doing their job. For student sports journalists, a lot of times that line is even tougher to walk. It’s for that reason that I draw the line at tweeting at those athletes.
I have said this before. We will win. The bankers will lose.
There have been many people who know the benefits of this tea. Green tea is the most powerful source of antioxidants that can help improve body functions. In addition to increasing metabolism, green tea can also be lose weight. Therefore, this tea is often consumed by those who are dieting.
I stamped on the inside of the card a little saying...
But I see her now, standing on top of my roof. My younger sister, thirteen. It was her in the visions. Not me.
Like me, you may see that as something of a conflict of interest for H&B, but the Royal firm duly went ahead, with Managing Partner Lawrence Abramson taking on the task personally. It goes without saying that an opinion from Abramson putting Newscorp in the clear would have gone down particularly well with Newscorp’s senior management. Lawrence Abramson duly delivered precisely that opinion. It seems that the report was comissioned from H&B by top Murdoch legal man Tom Crone, and the ‘results’ were reported to the Group’s legal boss Jon Chapman. Both men hurriedly departed Newscorp’s employment last week. James Murdoch worked closely with both of them, but he now claims to have known nothing about the advice sought from Harbottle & Lewis.
But being a sports fan has helped shape many parts of my life. Whether it has been the roller coaster of Hoosier Basketball the past four years, the roller coaster of Pacers seasons dating back to the unforgettable Reggie Miller days, or the anticipation for Andrew Luck’s joining of the Colts, these opportunities to show my pride are second to none. So to those of you who have a favorite team, or a hometown team, playing in whatever sport it may be…do yourself a favor and just believe they can win. Don’t try to get all factorial about a team for once and just join in on the cheers and chants and hope and pray for the best. It is worth it, I promise! (Take the all too, not quit yet overused, example of the unranked Hoosiers beating the No. 1 Kentucky Wildcats this season. Even if we lost to them in the Sweet 16 (then went on an won the whole tourney) it was still a moment of ecstasy I won’t soon forget.)
Should I buy it? Good heavens, no. For one thing, there is no such thing as “quilt-related humor,” and if there were I wouldn’t read it. Quilting is very, very serious and is only practiced by people of high morals and sterling character. Like politicians and teen pop stars.
Can we pause here for just a moment while I climb upon my house and throw myself off in disgust? That quote is from Weird Western Tales #26, the first place it appeared in print, and that issue was penned by Michael Fleisher. John Albano, if he wrote those words, never had them appear in a book penned by him. I like the idea of paying tribute to the man who created Jonah Hex, but how about doing it accurately and maybe also paying honor to the man who wrote well over 100 stories about Jonah Hex? What in the hell did Michael Fleisher do to continually get shafted when it comes his contributions regarding Jonah Hex?
Now go tackle that pile of mail with a sense of style.
… I would say ‘the end’ but instead I’ll say maybe we all should occasionally consider our relationship to the stars. I mean if there’s even the slightest truth in this story, don’t we owe it to ourselves to shine whenever we get the chance?
from band camp and took her first really hot shower
and the gratitude
When we go grocery shopping, we try to remember to eat first. If we forget, or if it’s not convenient, then we’ll be hungry by the time we get to the checkout line. And this means we’ll end up noshing on the rotisserie chicken we bought for our dinner well before we arrive home. Oh, heck, we’ll open the darn thing while Ned is still pulling out of the parking space and eat hunks. Good thing Ned keeps paper towels in the car.
Tomorrow I'll be shooting the book covers and the book trailers for my Scorpius series. A lot of work, all heading for the big day.
Ron Rock--who I'd never met before and who is extremely nice and very talented in addition to having the best name ever--gave a presentation that night on the new Swarovski Elements. I'm a Swarovski ambassador, and I learned more about the company from Ron that night than I ever had! (I know this photo is blurry, but I kind of like it, don't you? Ron is a gesticulator...)
I watched “New Girl” tonight. It’s cute and usually pretty light-hearted. I often feel like the “Jess” character because I’m – I’m pretty. I know I’m relatively pretty and I know I have a nice body for 38. But I’m awkward and rather nerdy. I say the wrong things when I get nervous. Jess makes much more of a fool of herself, but I completely identify. Lately she has found herself in a relationship with this dreamy older man named Russell. They immediately slip into comfort mode. Well, as comfortable as you can be with Jess being so awkward. Russell’s ex-wife invites them to dinner or something – they end up at dinner with his ex-wife and that’s when Jess notices that while divorced, they shared a visible passion. Jess wanted that passion with Russell and he said he liked their soft intimacy that he was done with torrid passion. It took too much out of him. Jess responded that she did want the passion and she broke up with him. She then spent days crying on the floor.
ROOM 6
1/2 cup cherries (sweet or sour) pitted and chopped
(It was really scary for the kids at first.) Some of the rays are bigger than you. And there is a glass window at one point of the experience that is filled with sharks. They can't get you, but it feels like your swimming with them. We watched them getting fed under the water. So cool.
"It's April thirteenth," I said.
Ink: Soft suede, pool party, calypso coral
I hope everyone is enjoying the season, wherever you are and however it presents itself where you live. The woods are snow covered now, with tracks from wild turkeys, deer, coyotes, rabbits, and birds meandering through them. The coyotes haven’t been howling much, but they are nearby, sometimes watching us silently from a distance as they blend into the colours of the trees behind them.
So far there seem to be two competing models for the online experience. On the one hand, there are the mega-entities like Facebook that are content to give to give you a platform to do anything you like (as long as it conforms to Disney standards and practices). All they ask in return is to siphon off a little bit of your life force in the form of selling all your personal information to the highest bidder. All in the name of trying to sell you more useless crap you probably don’t need. (Why Google ads thinks I would want to buy My Little Pony merch is beyond me.)
2. “immense joy fun cat”
Usman was probably aware of the intense scrutiny the Muslim community is undergoing, reinforced as much by similar fanaticism countries across the world have faced from the community as by the slew of terrorist attacks emanating from elements within their brotherhood in India, for he declared forcefully, “We (Muslims) ourselves say that they (the Islamist terrorists who attacked Mumbai) must be shot,” mimicking the pulling of the trigger as he spat the words with vehemence before continuing, “They should be hunted down.” A tubelight holder affixed to the roof of his taxi sported colours of the Indian flag. As the taxi hit a pothole the Koranic notation that hung from the rear view mirror jumped and swayed before steadying.
Having decided to catch up with couple of films from the classic Hollywood era, I felt that Hitchcock’s Shadow of a Doubt would be a good place to start my journey with. As with pretty much every other Alfred Hitchock directed movie, Shadow of a Doubt is thoroughly suspenseful and engaging, starting from an intriguing premise and building towards a dark and fitting finale. There are some really great performances to be had in this one, with Teresa Wright and Joseph Cotten standing on top and perfectly contrasting each other’s characters thanks to some incredible chemistry between the two. The storyline is well-written, with a few unnecessary diversions along the way, but these are rather insignificant as a whole. Shadow of a Doubt is perhaps most known for its dinner scene, where Joseph Cotten delivers a memorable and terrifying monologue as Uncle Charlie. Having recently got the chance to see this film on a cinema screen, I have to say that the effect of that scene varies quite a lot depending on how big of a screen you watch it on. Seeing it on my computer for the first time, the monologue was masterfully delivered, but it seemed to lack in terms of power. After witnessing it again on the big screen, though, it truly sent shivers down my spine. To cut to the chase, I highly advise you see Shadow of a Doubt on the largest screen possible (preferably at the cinema, but let’s face it – there’s little opportunity for that), though regardless of which way you view it, it ultimately remains a powerful and thought-provoking psychological exercise that showcases some of Hitchcock’s most effective tricks and techniques.
So Peri is potty trained and rockin it. Most days...When she says she has to go, you run like hell to get her to the nearest bathroom. She also likes to say "I pooping" when she really just needs to pee. We were at Nick's hockey game and Peri gave the signal. We ran, got there in time. Yay! And no poop. Until I got her pants on, both of our hands washed and turned around to find a piece of poop on the floor. Huh?!?!? Whose is that? How'd it get there. No way is that ours, is it? So I used 50+ paper towels and cleaned up the poop and we moved on with life.
This was exactly what needed to be said. Mr Stuart has surpassed all of my hopes and expectations; I was expecting a dry debate about the 20-day deregistration clause and I think that's because we're so used, after many years of Ed Balls, his party and the compliant education department that seemed to evolve around them, to politicians just completely ignoring the key issues which negatively affected our families in favour of their own high-handed agenda for us. Graham Stuart certainly can't be accused of that.
“He justifieth the ungodly.” “It is God that justifieth,” therefore, and for that reason only it can be done, and He does it through the atoning sacrifice of His divine Son. Therefore it can be justly done—so justly done that none will ever question it—so thoroughly done that in the last tremendous day, when heaven and earth shall pass away, there shall be none that shall deny the validity of the justification. “Who is he that condemneth? It is Christ that died. Who shall lay anything to the charge of God’s elect? It is God that justifieth.” Now, poor soul! will you come into this lifeboat, just as you are? Here is safety from the wreck! Accept the sure deliverance. “I have nothing with me,” say you. You are not asked to bring anything with you. Men who escape for their lives will leave even their clothes behind. Leap for it, just as you are.
Just about 4 weeks ago I had to rush out to New Jersey because my 86 year old mother nearly died after surgery. The day before she had a carcinoma removed from her chin which required plastic surgery to repair the damage. It was after the plastic surgery that she crashed and her oxygen level plummeted. It was a little touch and go for a few days. Such a relief when they were finally able to remove the breathing tube and hear her speak! She asked me if Congress had settled the debt limit situation!!! So like my mom and I just had to laugh out loud.
After all the bottles were filled, it was time to cork. We realized after doing a few on the countertop that it was about a hundred times easier to force the corks in while kneeling on the floor.
So… I shall be more careful of what I say, and put some thinking process before opening my gob – at least not wear my heart on the sleeve at all times.
I discussed the situation with some friends and feel I probably should not proceed with the whole family-trip-to-the-porn-store-so-Dad-can-buy-his-little-princess-a-festive-vibrator thing. It just doesn’t sound like a good idea, nor worth the $100 or so I will save. My biggest fear was that my father was hoping to make an impression during the vibe buying process so that I might remember his generosity whilst enjoying my Christmas gift. Funny thing though – call me crazy, but I don’t want to think about my father when I’m doing anything involving my genitals. I’m just not wired that way.
Both journals written by the old, reflecting upon their lives. I also drew parallels to Alan Hollinghurst’s 2011 long listed “The Stranger’s Child” which explored the life of homosexual war poet Cecil Valance and his literary and personal impact across generations and (of course the) biographers coming to call. Throw in the subject of madness, which was explored by Bernice Rubens with her Booker winning “The Elected Member” from 1970. Or mix in the country setting of J.L. Carr’s shortlisted “A Month in the Country” from 1980 (a tale of World War 1 veteran employed to restore a mural in a country church) and I suddenly had a plethora of similar material which I have read (and reviewed some of them here) over the last nine months.
Each age has interpreted Christianity after its own fashion. The religion of the barnstorming American revivalists of the nineteenth century was certainly something different from that of Luther or the medieval mystics or the apostolic fathers. The bishops who met at Nicea in the fourth century to defend the faith of Christ from the attack of the Arians surely differed radically from the scholars and saints who stood to defend that same faith from the attack of the higher critics in the early twentieth century.
The dotGrid is awesome! The dots look gray to my eye, but if I blow them up on the scanner I can see that they are a light lilac color. It's very easy on the eyes and definitely less instrusive than a full grid.
Then it will be time for some recreation with the living... my family and friends. Perhaps we will swim, or garden, or have a picnic. Summer begins this way, with remembering and recreating, a good combination in many ways. May your Memorial Day weekend be a good one too!
The truth is Peter revealed their lie and greed. Before the whole church he exposed their hypocrisy and God struck them dead. And the church moved on in victory.
The plan is once a month I will showcase a range of travel posts, not just from the parenting blogging circle, but from the wider travel community.
Analogically, last year I did Story a Day. I did not write 31 stories. I fell in love with some stories and lingered over them. Some ran to 7500 words and took two or three days to draft. Some stories didn't come out right the first day I tried to write them, so I gave myself permission to try writing them again the next day. I don't naturally write to flash lengths, so I had no expectations about doing that, but I gave myself permission to write super super fast and crank out a 2-4k story most days. I got one good story out of the month, and 18 monsters, so 19 stories in all. Besides that one good piece, the rest...well, I toy with one or two, but mostly they're trunked.
And wish that name were carved for us.
The Christmas trees went up in our house a little sooner than I wanted this Christmas as the girls really wanted to put them up (eldest Sweetpea wasn't really interested this year :-(). I usually put off putting up the trees for some reason but then hate taking them down - I miss all those twinkly fairy lights :-(. I put the lights on and then let the girls freestyle it :-)
There's no split views on the matter here at Barnacle Towers.
Third, given my own context—that of an art school grad still paying off student loans, and likely to into the future, as I work freelance-contract-cheque to freelance-contract-cheque in this wonderful creative economy—I often find it amusing/alienating when people imply that the problem in the art world is too much money, or too much power accorded to money by virtue of there being so much of it thrown around. That money-flush situation is a reality very, very far from the place/subculture/ring of the art circus where I (now a writer and editor) and my close friends and colleagues happen to live. In my experience, artists and writers (even successful artists and writers) are people who by and large struggle to make ends meet, who juggle multiple jobs to keep a roof over their heads, who must rent instead of buy (at least in Toronto). Not that that’s a tragedy of any kind; I don’t mean to wring out a tearful sob story here and imply that artists and other creative professionals are at the very bottom rung of the economy or are in dire need of help. Compared to domestic workers and service workers, artists often have some social capital and, if they chose to go to art school, often have the security of some middle-class (or yet loftier) family background to act as a safety net. All I’m trying to say is there are many different subcultures to this thing called “art” and in the one I live in, a surplus of money and the power it might wield isn’t typically something one has to worry about.
Could ever exist,
Keep us in mind....."When it needs to be JustRite".
Several hundred protesters, alerted by the social networking site Facebook, turned out to rally on Wednesday night against plans by the billionaire's System Capital Management (SCM) company to build a multi-storey business centre on "Andriyivsky Descent", a picturesque cobbled street and one of Ukraine's best-known tourist spots.
The amazing thing about grace, I heard in another song this week, is that we are free to give it away.
Because of the title track being covered by the likes of Lion´s Share and Jorn Lande, I was pointed to this fantastic, yet unknown to me, band from England.
Hugh Brody
If you have a strong colour on your walls, consider grouping your images in an equally dramatic way. We could have gone with mahogany frames here, or all-white ones, but the black and white mix seemed to be more sophisticated – and surprising. This was a difficult wall to decorate because the old 1970's tongue-and-groove was on a diagonal and rather than rip it all out we just painted it in Kate Spade green, which reflected the garden outside. These garden prints and photographs brought it all together.
SWEDISH CRIME WRITERS GO GLOBAL: LAUNCH OF STOCKHOLM TEXT PUBLISHING
4. Couldn't spell "restraunt" if my life depended on it.
I was really stumped for the last one of these, then I had the idea of getting a downloaded paper doll image with clothes that you can dress her in. I remember playing with these paper dolls in my childhood - many years ago!LOL
She said: "A number of people present that day were likely to be offended.
Prince of Naples, so all the women are one woman, and the two sexes meet
Added FBI Special Agent in Charge Andrew Arena: "This dangerous street gang was responsible for numerous acts of violence that robbed citizens of their safety and sense of security.” He warned the indictments “ serve as a reminder we will be relentless in bringing these criminals to justice.”
Mission Beach, San Diego
If that wasn’t enough, her shirt had a layer of lotion on it. Her face was white with lotion. And her hair was hanging in greasy, wet tangles. Of course, there was no time for a bath if we wanted to be on time for church.
I want her to move on. I don’t want her back, and I completely understand that I am not going to be part of any adventure that includes her. What I can’t stand is the idea that she is perfectly comfortable with living out the dreams that we made together, without even including the kids.
My face is caked with patchy mud, glued to my pores by tax paying and sweat.
even if I could.
And we'd count them stars at night
Have a lovely weekend. What are you up to? Hope all you Mum's out there enjoy your special day on Sunday. Px
For best flavor, complete the cake 1 day ahead.
every moment
I figure that with the amount of veggies I eat and the the amount of stress I have going on, Ideserveadamncookieeverynowandthendamnitall!!!
Indeed, paintball is also called paint, and it is fun and keeps the paintball gun cases new ways to have good rate of ammunition are the paintball gun cases and goggles for a reliable paintball marker may be one of these security labels sometimes make this to ensure that participants take the paintball gun cases to somewhat of a cheap paintball gun. Generally, the paintball gun cases of paintball regardless of where you're going to be reloaded more often than the paintball gun cases, existing, and fictional situations and themes are recreated on big paintball fields tend to be carefully considered as it will help narrow the choices.
On the front there is a large satin bow with an agate
Obviously both beers looked exactly the same—bright, golden-copper with a thin, yet creamy, head. Both were crisp and cold with a pronounced American hoppiness and a powerful but not overpowering bitterness. By all accounts I was drinking the same beer—but I wasn't. Even with all those factors being the same, something was off. I knew exactly what it was when I popped the tab on the canned version—the aroma. The canned version somehow lacked the smelly oomph of the bottle. Even after pouring it into the pint glass, it still lacked that pungent wallop in the sniffer. The canned SN seemed subtler and more mellow than the bottled version. Was the canned version more subdued because I didn't get that hoppy smell? Does the head space in the bottle help to somehow capture the hoppy aroma? I don't know, but I do know the canned version was missing it—for sure.
till then shall we be solitary, both you and me.
I couldn't fit the lamp in the picture, but there would be an orange lamp there, since the room does not have overhead lighting. I think I may also look for a plug in pendant lamp to help with overhead lighting.
And that's where things get fuzzy.
Who is Obama?
I grow the corn, you gimme the husk
They come in two forms: hydrated and dehydrated. The dehydrated ones (shown above) are less expensive. I picked up a pack for a couple bucks. The package says that it makes ONE GALLON of water beads. To hydrate the beads, I used 2 liters of water and half the pack of beads. You need to let them sit for 4-6 hours. This is neat to let the kids watch how they grow over time. Once they are hydrated, the sky is the limit for play. We currently use them on our light table.
The authors in the promotion have been published by houses such as Scholastic, Dell, HarperCollins, Simon Pulse, Avon, E.P. Dutton, Millbrook, Lerner, and St. Martin’s Minotaur, and have written for Broadway, to name a few of their accomplishments. Don’t miss this one-day exclusive offer to give your child an e-book (or many e-books!) Adult readers will find much to enjoy on this list also.
Humans have long posed a threat to the docile, huge-headed animals, which were hunted to near extinction in the 19th and 20th centuries because of their slowness and buoyancy after being killed (thus making them the “right” whale to hunt for their oil and baleen). But there are indications that in the coming decades the whales will be affected by a changing planet.
mind boggling. Every person we’ve spoken to just wanted to help us and
I took the teapot, cup and saucer and 4 spoons from the tea set and gave the rest to my daughter as a special surprise (bonus... embellishments for my project AND thankful kisses from my daughter!). I spray painted the tea set items and set aside. (Surprisingly, the silver spray paint worked beautifully! No dripping and it was very resistant to scratching!)
To top it off, Michael was sick again when he came from over there. He was sent to school even though he told his father he was sick…he stayed at school all day. Angie looked at his throat when he got home – it was red and swollen. He went to see the doctor yesterday…he has strep! When he got home on Monday, he was starved – he ate and drank a lot and went to sleep and slept for 2½ - 3 hours. He woke up, ate dinner and went back to sleep. Yesterday morning he got up at 5, was up for a little while, and went back to sleep. He went to the doctor’s and was diagnosed with strep and an earache. He came home, took his medicine, ate lunch, was asleep by 2:30 and slept until Angie woke him at 6:30 p.m. His throat is still very swollen this morning – but he goes back over there today. Maybe since he’s sick, he will be able to sleep over there. He has such difficulty sleeping there!
Chariots
5. Despite living in Glasgow for the last decade and not going 'home' very often (I come from a small town about an hour away from the city) I still occasionally slip into my local dialect and hit out with words and expressions that only folk from the 'shire would understand. Prime examples of this, much to my husband's amusement, are "een" which means 'eye', "ai-ways" meaning 'always' and "tha-morn's-mournin'" which translates as 'tomorrow morning'. Madame G of Baroque Boudoir is also from another small town, not far away from where I grew up and I am very aware that after a couple of hours in her company after a few rums, it sounds like I've never left.
Friday night at the movies found us snuggled on the floor and the sofas with huge bowls of Deb’s popcorn watching favorite shows and wonderful movies. The kids would then “camp out” all night after we went to bed telling stories and watching more movies. It was brother and sister bonding time for them – a bond that was tighter than we could have imagined.
The sky cleared.
Basically, America has been transformed into 12 districts, ruled by the Capitol. There had been an uprising, which was squelched by the Capitol, followed by a period of peace. To keep all the districts in their place and remind them never to try to revel again, every year each district must send 2 tributes, a boy and a girl ages 12 to 18 to fight to the death. The children are selected via a Reaping. One victor emerges, bringing showers of gifts and wealth to the family and district.
Every day I feel a little closer to getting my official Feminist card revoked. I still hear that little voice that condemns me for my lack of financial and occupational independence. I still have this nagging feeling that I shouldn’t let other people take care of me, even when they derive obvious pleasure from taking care of me. Despite all my soapboxes, it is still hard for me to believe that there are other ways to measure personal success beyond my GPA and my savings account. Every day I wake up and feel the need to justify the air that I breathe.
One of Ron’s latest posts about George Younger notes that consumers in the West Indies would mix some rum into the ale to increase its strength.
(i love that rug!)
spay_neuter: Yes
This was by far one of the best and worst series of games. I’m sure it gave almost every Rangers fan agita at one point in time.
Don Juan Carlos’ popularity, credibility and work in creating a democratic Spain gave him wide latitude to travel and get involved with politics and business. It appears that the Spanish head of state will be on a much tighter leash from now on.
This week's NW4NW features Haysi Fantayzee's two big singles. First up, the exuberant "Shiny Shiny," followed by "John Wayne Is Big Leggy." Enjoy!
None of this prepared me for two major events which helped me understand behavior.
Ill Ryhmz and Tiwa Savage
“How do we get out?” she asked, turning back to the Minotaur.
“Are the stars the lights in the cities of God?” I asked softly.
Can't I show weakness, happiness, honesty, kindness, and fallibility just a little more often?
#32 Fangbone! Third-Grade Barbarian by Michael Rex (Read 11/03/2012) Oh, well, this one is just a whole stack of silly fun. Imagine every over-the-top, fantasy barbarian stereotype transposed to a Grade 3 classroom and you’ll be in the right mode for this junior graphic novel. I recommend it just so you can enjoy Fangbone’s story of why the sun rises each morning (hint: it has nothing to do with the Earth’s rotation, but does involve a Cycloptopus’ eye).
2. Video game video walkthroughs. Sure, the printed walkthroughs are good and all, but it’s so much better when you can actually see what you’re supposed to be doing. I wouldn’t be surprised if these eventually pushed out the printed walkthrough. Then again, if you watch too much of the walkthrough, what’s the point of playing the game yourself?
Don’t forget the medical world, where the Holy Spirit kept the communicable diseases under control, helped scientist conquer individual illnesses. But as He withdraws we will see more diseases.
“Mom I want to do rice pancakes for breakfast and then swedish meatballs and rice for dinner….but Brandon can’t have rice right?”
When it rained, it was soft
In other words, political liberalism, with a commitment to debate and free speech, is prior to economic liberalism.
1934 – It Happened One Night
It seems that the 2011-2012 political year should be called Happy Hunting Season for Women. It is pretty bad when even I, oblivious of politics, take notice of all the issues surrounding women. What is it about women’s reproductive system that is so threatening to everyone? I admit that my personal beliefs do not make room for abortion as a contraceptive. I know that some women carelessly use this method to cover their irresponsible behaviors. However, I do believe in abortion only in extenuating life and death medical emergency circumstances. Before anyone starts bitching about playing God with life and death, then think about that the next time someone needs extensive medical intervention to save a life. We all cognitively know that it takes only one time for a MAN to impregnate a woman; however, all the blame is solely place on the woman’s ’slutty’ shoulders. Again why is that?
During my last nap, I discovered the meaning of life, the universe and everything, which I must share with everyone. It is......izzzzz.....
a couple days passed and I received a comment... I realized that it was only me that was having this problem, not all blogger users, and it was a big problem.
Then, I saw why.
Magic decal coating paper is a complimentary product designed to be used in conjunction with standard decal paper to make the finished transfers durable - yes, even dishwasher resistant!
reserved to federal officials, one must consider the vile nature of
3. A Hole In Her Mind
I actually have an office!! I often close the door and listen to music, which is good and bad. I think I forget sometimes that I am in an office and that the wall are paper thin. So far I have only busted myself humming. However, the other day people cleared out early and I totally could have been jamming out! Fridays are like a ghost town and the offices on either side of me are usually empty. So, my "night owl" status and being up too late, like tonight are not great when it's that quiet. I will just have to use one of my "what to do when caught sleeping at work" excuses, like...when found asleep in your office and you manage to rouse yourself from sleep when someone enters the room simply open your eyes and say "amen".
Tanglewood Inn, awaiting your arrival.”
As I walked through this vast store, holding tight to James's unwilling hand (this is definitely a store you can lose a child in easily), I could feel myself falling in love. In truth, I'm not a huge fan of modern art or architecture, but I sure was falling in love with it that day!
And she argued against him
Divide the currants or raisins evenly among the "tarts" and spoon the filling over them. Most recipes tell you to fill them 2/3 full.. I would say these end up being closer to almost full.
Though posts don't have to be specifically religious in nature for this linky I'd prefer not to have posts focused on beer, luck, and leprechauns, unless they are discussed from a Christian perspective. Examples:
I also know from first-hand experience what a great party UKIP is to be part of. I will miss my friends from the Conservative party, many of whom are good people whose political views mirror mine. My decision to defect certainly is no reflection on the personal calibre of 99% of Conservative party activists. However, I already have many fantastic friends in Young Independence who are down to earth, like a damn good night out, and are exclusively motivated by principles and not career prospects. UKIP have been extremely welcoming to me already and I feel that I can speak out against any policies I disagree with without the constant presence of CCHQ breathing down my back as soon as I waver from the party line. UKIP is a democratic party that knows that it is there solely because of its grassroots members, something which the Conservative party seems to have forgotten. All in all, leaving the Conservative party and joining UKIP feels like a massive weight off my shoulders. I can’t wait to campaign and get involved with a party that I feel I can be proud to be a member of, and stand up for liberty once more.
change whilst the car is in motion in accordance with Article 3.18, they must be bridged by means of pairs
—February 24, 2005
Similarly, bogging us down in long cutscenes or copious text in the opening is an equally solid way to guarantee we won't give a crap about your game's story. We want to play right away. We want to inhabit the game world, not simply view it or read about it. This is especially important in horror games like the Dead Space franchise, where so much of the tension is dependent on the player's reaction to in-game sights and sounds. The backstory is relevant only inasmuch as it informs the conflict of the moment. (That's why I think the franchise masters have made the right call in shunting most of the series' lore to other media like novels and comics instead of burdening the games with it.)
Tags: bros., mario, new, new air-conditioned mario, new air-conditioned mario bros., nintendo, super, air-conditioned mario
In terms of exercise, I really enjoyed Tracy's exercises and they do work. I am much more toned, have lost an incredible amount of inches in areas I have always had a problem with (legs, and hips mainly), and just feel and look better as a result of the exercise. That being said, I found the cardio quite limiting and am looking forward to taking up running again (it is slowly starting to get lighter in the evenings). I am aiming to do the Tracy workouts twice a week, mixing the sequences up for variety, and trying to up the reps the whole time.
even after all of that complaining, i look at her, waddling around the living room, "tra-la-la"ing with her little sing songy voice, and i can't help but be overwhelmed by how blessed i am.
Well, Shu learns that if he looks inbetween their eyebrows it also works, so doesn’t actually have to make eye contact. Because he’s just so beta. Cue montage of him pulling random voids out of random people and this is all basically a very rapey scene.
More Rendez-Vous films to come.
Still at 1cm, but pitocin drip has been upped which should progress things a little further. In about an hour Amy will check me again and will then break my water.
Well, we finally bit the bullet on getting a new couch, and it couldn't have come at a better time! Just in time for me to be sick and lay on it for 4 days straight! PERFECT! haha
“That’s not fair,” grumbled T14, “Why should he get two days at home watching television?”
1. People who walk on my mat.
Black sweet blood mouthfuls,
Finally, a special thanks to those of you who helped me compile this History.
Menu & Beverage Pairings:
The Colts are installing a 3-4 defense and Chapman would seem to be a great addition to that unit.
By the way, in an effort to find a new way to make some money, since selling books isn’t what Brien is good at according to Brien when he tells authors:
Here are my "keepin' it real" details for this project:
Choice is directed at some end, and this involves determining what the end should be and how it should be reached. We are responsible for the choices we make and for their consequences. We are free to make choices and to take actions based on those choices.
I have been a busy, busy girl and been comin' up with some fabulous cards! So here are the Christmas cards you could be making if you were one of the lucky attendees for my Advance Stamper Christmas Card workshop this Saturday.
Carrots: They are loaded with minerals and vitamins such as manganese, beta carotene, calcium and iron. If you have weak vision functions currently, you will benefit from these minerals and vitamins. Try intake of carrot juice every day. Mix together one standard sized carrot together with milk and ice. You can in addition to this add honey to perk up the flavor.
"The Superfluous Finger"
I'm tired of anytime another terrorist incident happens, the Muslim clerics jumping to the terrorists' defense. I'm tired of the Muslims boasting how they're taking over the world. I'm really tired of the talk that the imams spout about how one day, all us "infidels" will be slaves to the Muslims. My ass.
Once you contact a tech support service provider regarding issues with Windows OS, your system is provided with apt and prompt Windows remote support and all your issues are taken care of and resolved. The support is offered for all Windows OS and applications starting from Microsoft Windows XP, Windows Vista to Microsoft Windows 7 and other relevant OS. Your operating systems get upgraded and updated through such tech supports and you can eventually get proficient tech assistance over the Microsoft products like the Microsoft Office and Outlook.
Men who are serving should be at the sacristy by 6pm with their own cassocks and cottas.
Offer up a free sundae with all the trimmings to anyone willing to sit with me and answer 5 questions. On the record.
I hate driving home from a road trip. Especially this morning. I drove the 5 and half hours back from Boston with 4 cups of coffee and a large Red Bull pumping through my veins. We left at midnight, so I didn’t even bother trying to get any sleep last night. I’m surprised I wasn’t hallucinating by the end of the trip. No sleep in 24 hours? Trippy, man. But well worth it.
Shone upon
includes the mother of a severe 12 year old ME sufferer speaking about his illness
what I would normally wear so easy.
I went to a purse market in North Jakarta with some friends earlier last week. It was so fun! It was definitely one of those local shopping and cultural experiences I’ve wanted to have and I absolutely loved it. It was a half-day (semi full-day) event, but by the time I got home, I was exhausted! It was the place you can get knockoffs. I’m talking about big brand names. I am not a brand name person as I cannot afford any of them first of all, but second of all, I think there are cute and stylish designs with lower prices available at Target or H&M where I used to shop and I’m happy with the products I can afford. Even someone like me thought it was exciting to go there for shopping! I admit that it is fun to get the same brand name items that magazines feature as what celebrities carry except what you can find at this market is not real and sold with affordable prices.
Today I am sharing some very precious info about ”oily skin”with all of you,,,,hope my readers will get some help.
Not backing down, Georgian President Mikheil Saakashvili - who launched and lost a war for South Ossetia in 48 hours in August 2008 - has declared the blockade of Abkhazia, which he claims as Georgian national territory, will remain in force. And he has just appointed as defense minister a 29-year-old ex-penitentiary boss with a questionable record on human rights who wants to tighten ties to NATO.
TCI: You said part of enjoyment of Privilege was, as you said, that narcissistic joy of creating personal, your own thing. Is that why you decided to release the LPs through your own label Slender Means Society, your own personal label, as opposed to working with Tomlab again?
Still, I move steadily forward.
But you and me are easy meat to track.
I have yet to be disappointed by any of Uinta's Crooked Line beers. They are all pretty unique and all are above average in my opinion. Birthday Suit is Uinta's greatest departure from what they've traditionally done in more than one way. Uinta has never made a fruit beer or a sour. Birthday Suit fills these gaps in their portfolio nicely.
Thank goodness, then, for the legal deposit libraries and their hoards of books. At my university, we have a constant battle to stop the library throwing out books – including some first editions. We have to sign to say we want them preserved. Surely a function of any library is to have that out of print book that only a few will want. I often go back to a really old source and find that what is suggested is surprisingly up to date and what I had thought were new ideas are in fact very old. We have to change our thinking here. The librarians constantly say there is no room so they must get rid of the books. Some books are priceless. We should see the problem from the other angle and create more space instead of getting rid of books.
The book opens post-Games, with Katniss bemoaning her dreadful life. Sure, she survived the Games with little actual blood on her hands. Sure, she and her family now live in the Victors’ Village, wealthier than they’ve ever been. She still hunts for the enjoyment of it, has Cinna covering her ass for the talent she should be developing in her plentiful spare time, and is generous to the people of her district. But woe is Katniss, because she and Peeta barely talk (after she rejected him) and Gale’s busy being worked to death per customary Capitol oppression 6 days per week and is bitter about her macking on Peeta on TV. Katniss is a foolish, oblivious young girl when it comes to matters of the heart, and it still detracts from and demolishes the “strong heroine” label people wish to thrust upon her. Collins still doesn’t sell it well, and I’m still not buying it.
The aroma gives off some decent woody hops, and with the dual hints of butterscotch (not overwhelming this time) and sour apple. This is how it's supposed to smell. The smell is actually pretty complex, because further down the line, we get some nutty, toasted malts, as well as alcohol-soaked raisin, and all under the woody pine hops.
The orcs of Faerun are primitive, cowardly cannon fodder of low intelligence. They are goblinkin, and live in caves with seemingly little family structure. These orcs are only brave and loyal when they think a victory is imminent, but at the first sign of defeat they turn tail and run. In large battles, there seems to be no concern for loyalty or well-being – either of themselves or their fellows. Orcs charge through lines and doors blindly, push their comrades out of the way or throw them into danger in their stead. Lastly, orcs are quite dumb – they speak very broken, to the point where they can barely understand each other, and other than war tactics, I would not trust these guys with my homework.
"I'd like to get two of the 7 piece specials. Crispy & grilled. Mashed potatoes. Yes, I know, but it's cheaper to get two of the 7 piece deals. I'll just take that. No, thank you. We don't need a cake. Yes I know it's free with the other meal, but we get more chicken for the same price this way. But I don't want a cake so it doesn't matter that the other deal comes with a cake. Yes. Two of the 7 piece deals. One crispy, one grilled. ??? No, I meant one 7 piece ORDER grilled and one crispy. No, I don't have 7 orders... 7 pieces of chicken grilled, 7 pieces crispy. 2 of the 7 piece deals... Get it? Yay! Ok. (Smile, smile... don't let them know that you're secretly plotting a SMACKDOWN at KFC and Big Lots...)"
In Big Bouffant, Annabelle tries to make a bouffant by herself, fails, asks her mom for help, and then becomes so stylish that everyone wants to copy her. Once she is bored with bouffants, Annabelle manages to start a new trend.
In the case of this piece, and many pieces thereafter, I took the process a step further, and wrote lyrics as well. I gave these lyrics to Andrew in advance, so he had an idea of what was brewing in my mind along with the melody. The end result has had a lasting impression which results in us never tiring of playing the piece together. Here are the lyrics:
My boys gave me a Mommy's day tea party at pre-school today, they sang to ME...and I could see His face.
2. #TheTrend
C) The city planning guy should to, but he’s obviously too stupid.
Mornings were spent walking along the shore where we witnessed fish being caught, dogs defecating and pelicans defending their turf against unwelcome foul.
First,I was lucky enough to be asked by Michelle to be part of her Design team, you will find the link HERE
that were sent to arrest Him one time, after hearing Him speak, concluded “No
it-----EAGLES---I would actually be able to watch LIVE
Those familiar with the readings for Holy Week recognise Mary (of) Clopas — also Mary of Cleophas — as being present at both the Cross and Christ’s empty tomb at His Resurrection. It is thought that she was married to Joseph’s brother Cleophas, also known as Alphaeus. Clopas, Cleophas and Alphaeus appear to be names for the same man.
Getting news releases and information out today is not just about print publications, websites, and news outlets. The “blogsphere” is a very important component when disseminating information about your company, services, or products. There are bloggers who specialize in certain industries, those who attract a specific target audience and those who are known for their expertise.
Based on our choices, the program generated a set of menus and we would follow to eat in the coming two weeks.
Larva is a not-too thinly-veiled commentary on corporate greed at the expense of domestic farmers. In order to compete with foreign exports and eke out a living they get into bed with greedy corporations like Tender Meats. Their tinkering with genetically altered meat ends up biting them in their corporate asses as the dangerous parasites begin decimating the small town, refusing to discriminate as women and children are readily dispatched. Basically, Larva is a wish fulfillment revenge tale as the arrogant corporation gets its well-deserved karmic payback. For a low-budget horror movie it has pretty decent production values, solid direction by Tim Cox, and an enticing premise that is well-executed by a cast refusing to simply phone it in as is sometimes the case with these films. When you’re dealing with a movie like this one, it is important that your lead actors have good chemistry. It is a bit of a gamble casting two very different actors together and then team them up with an ex-supermodel but the filmmakers pull it off by creating an engaging horror movie that hits all the usual narrative beats but does so in entertaining fashion. It may be familiar ground well-traveled but so long as it is done well, who cares? Larva is a dark comedy but one that never winks knowingly at the audience, instead opting to play it straight and deliver the epitome of a guilty pleasure.
Keep a lot of junk. I'm a bit of a hoarder.
Jae Ha was injured and his brother lovingly tend to treat his wounded arm. As they talk, the topic turned awry when Jae Ha threateningly told Jae Kang that if he gets into trouble and Jae Ha becomes King, his hyung will be dead meat. I suppose this two doesn’t want to be King. But there’s one person who surely wants to, the pen stabber! He gave me creeps when he wrote at the window and stared back at Jae Ha with evil eyes.
The world is in the business of getting you to buy things. Most of the things the world wants you to buy are not practical or even comfortable. If you don’t believe me, go to a high school football game this Friday night, and watch the boys and girls spending inordinate amounts of energy hitching up their pants or brushing their hair out of their eyes.
At speeds about 10,000 times faster than a typical broadband connection, “the grid” will be able to send the entire Rolling Stones back catalogue from Britain to Japan in less than two seconds.
2.Doves
I have to sit on my hands, but my hyperactive self is on I-cant-take-it mode.
Half a day at the relaxing mountainside + half a day at a warm beach
diane@anotherplanet.com, with your name, daytime phone number and address.
The preoccupation with Light Space and its subsequent transparency of matter (as seen in the plethora of modern architecture and interiors that are opened to invite maximum lightness of space) may be a desire to control that which would be otherwise lost to the darkness. If not, its character would be encompassed, the edges blurred so that its identity becomes a part of that Dark Space, obscured by shadows. Yet without the ‘threat’ of darkness, the powerful nature of light would become a dilution of its full capacity. “For it is the intimate associations of the two, their uncanny ability to slip from one to the other, that the sublime as an instrument of fear retains its hold – in that ambiguity that stages the presence of death in life, and dark space in bright space.”
I have no idea how long this sort of thing could sustain anyone's attention, to be honest; but what might be called oral histories of missing space could extend from demolished buildings to whole war-destroyed towns, from renovated suburban homes to newly partitioned spaces in a nearby office high-rise. The point would be to tour buildings based only on what those buildings used to be.
I managed to prise my mucky paws off the sofa, table and lamp I really wanted, and instead treated myself to two crates for the garden (to put plant pots and herbs in), four of the best smelling candles to ever venture anywhere near my nostrils, a jar of Herefordshire honey (I’m a big toast eater) and some incense sticks.
Ending a filibuster in the Senate requires 60 votes, so at least seven Republicans would have to vote in favor of ending debate on the measure.
“God fixation won’t fix our nation, because nothing fails like prayer,” Gaylor proclaimed during her address. “And we like to tell pious politicians that it’s time to get off your knees.”
Chest of drawers cleaned out.
The foregoing quotes bespeak the pre-occupation of some religions and psychology of that day (and perhaps even today) with “self-help,” “suggestion,” “auto-suggestion,” “hypnotism,” “new thought,” “moral psychology,” “relaxation techniques,” “inward transfer,” “re-education of the conscious powers,” and “psychotherapeutics” See Elwood Worcester, Samuel McComb, Isador H. Coriat. Religion and Medicine: The Moral Control of Nervous Disorders. NY: Moffat, Yard & Company, 1908. These psychological approaches have frequently been claimed as a new approach to Christian religion and sometimes been mislabeled “conversion” cures. See Elwood Worcester and Samuel McComb. The Christian Religion as a Healing Power. NY: Moffat, Yard and Company, 1909. The Emmanuel Movement stands as one example. See Leslie D. Weatherhead. Psychology Religion and Healing. NY: Abingdon-Cokesbury Press, 1951. But the cure that comes from “altering” or “re-educating the subconscious” is not the cure that Christians ascribe to salvation, putting on the mind of Christ, and acting with belief in and obedience to God’s Word. See as to healing consummated in Christ: Isaiah 53:3-5; Matthew 8:16-17; 1 Peter 2:24; as to the new man in Christ: 2 Corinthians 5:17-18; as to putting on the new man—the mind of Christ: Romans 12:2, Ephesians 4:23, Colossians 3:10; and as to claiming cure by belief: Mark 16:16-21; Hebrews 4:14-16; 1 John 5:4-5; William Law. The Power of the Spirit. PA: Christian Literature Crusade, 1971; E. W. Kenyon. Jesus The Healer. WA: Kenyon’s Gospel Publishing Society, 2000; Ethel R. Willits. Healing in Jesus Name. Detroit: Ethel R. Willits, Evangelist, 1931; James Moore Hickson. Heal the Sick. London: Methuen & Co., 1925. The latter two Christian healing books were owned, studied, and circulated to AAs by Dr. Bob.
Anyway, come on in....we will be coming in through the garage door into our back entry. Ya know, back door guests are best! :)
Of course we all know about the two big issues that are apparently both big issues for women – abortion (or is that reproductive rights now?) and gays. Other than that I was only able to find a couple of lists with some issues on it. I will deal with them and the above issues as I see them and how I believe the political parties and Romney deals or will deal with them.
Make Believe
Nostalgia also hits. I sometimes wish I could have told my teenage self that the things I cried over were really not worth it in the end, because they didn't matter in the long run. But that is what age is for, to understand what is not worth it in the long run and to pare down your life into what is really worth it.
"While the judgment is quite lucid and rehearses the various arguments and counter arguments in a very articulate manner, the judge unfortunately got the law wrong. The making of a sound recording does not extinguish any of the underlying rights in the music and lyrics (these underlying rights continue to vest with music composer and lyricist). When a song is broadcast on an FM channel, both the rights in the sound recording as also the right in the underlying works are implicated. And the FM radio station has to pay two separate license fees (one to IPRS which collects on behalf of underlying artists and the other to PPL which collects on behalf of sound recording copyright owners).
On Thursday I had a Dr. appt. where I was 2-3 cm, but still a really long cervix. This was 1 day past my due date. The Dr. stripped my membraines and scheduled an appointment for Friday afternoon to do the same thing again. Then the Dr. asked if I was interested in being induced on Sunday because she was on call that day. I was a little conflicted because I hated to be induced if the baby wasn't ready, but I was sure ready. So Thursday afternoon I was playing with Macie and she and I were bouncing around the living room. I laid down on the couch and when I sat up I felt a slight 'gush'. So I had to ask myself, was that my water breaking? Was that my bladder leaking? I spent the next 30 minutes looking up how to tell if the water is broken. All signs pointed to yes. So I called the Dr. office and the nurse said not to wait, to go straight to Labor and Delivery. I called Dh who was finishing up lesson plans at work, and my mom who was going to watch Macie. I finished packing my bag, but since I wasn't in actual labor, I didn't know if I was going to be coming home, if maybe I was just being paranoid and my water hadn't broken....there were lots of questions.
1. Miles Davis - Rated X
Today, I officially name this blog: Books to Infinity and Beyond.
Unsurprisingly, such cards were often not kept or recorded by their recipients. As a result, although it is known that about half of valentines' cards in the mid-century USA were 'vinegar', we don't know if the same proportions applied in Britain.
Audacity of Hope
We were perusing a recent issue of Men's Journal on the subway the other night, and were pleasantly surprised to see (in their October 2008 issue) an article entitled "Best Beers 2008: American Brewmasters Take Over." Inside the issue was a number of beer recommendations - we'd like to summarize them here, as it's a genuine pleasure to see the liberal Mainstream media finally approach a topic like this without their bias and politics and geegaws and whatnot. Anyway.
Write about hate, she says. It's a strong emotion - one of the strongest, surely - so it must be there somewhere, in my story, in yours.
Also working in smalls sections really helps. Back in November I decided I was going to deep clean and organize the entire kitchen. I didn’t succeed, but because I worked in small sections I made lasting change. The most noticeable is the fire place.
Just wondering along.
not for infants or the old
From the time the FCA receives the completed petition, an initial hearing is typically scheduled within three months. A decision is usually rendered within two weeks. The remainder of time depends on whether the other party files an appeal and whether the parent voluntarily complies with the order. If the taking parent does not comply, execution of the return will take longer, depending on the willingness of the Procureur to enforce the order.
If you can’t believe in the you who believes in yourself, then believe in the me who believes in you. I know what I’m talking about here, and I know you can do this. I’m not just speaking in general terms here. I know you can do this, because it’s a skill I had to learn, too. If you think I wriggled out of my mother’s cesarean incision with these skills, you’re wrong. If you think I don’t still have work left to do, you’re wrong. Odds are that we are not so different that you cannot do what I did, and am still learning to do.
For the sake of our love I’ll keep
To be honest, I’m almost afraid to leave my house as I know I’ll immediately be disconnected from the outside (but it’s not is it?) world. I stepped out to go to the shop and my initial reaction was to take out my phone and check twitter, this actually caused a mini-panic when I realised I didn’t have my phone until I remembered my predicament.
Can't even see the game or the Sugar Ray fight
C) Greed
Is there a driving instructor somewhere teaching people to do this? Or is it just passed down generation to generation from one shitty driver to the fruit of that shitty driver’s loin?
For that picture I had u go from 0 to 16 pi or 8 round trips.
Why the double standards? The following pages encourage fair minded Norwegians to support the State, the media and social media to consider Breivik guilty without anything resembling a rule of law free or fair trial. It may not be intelligent advocacy, but in a free speech republic, it is their free speech right. Why does it bother the English and Norwegian Defence League, when anyone advocates on behalf of a free and fair trial for Breivik? If you were a fair minded Norwegian, who considers the rule of law important, and who believes you live in a democratic Norwegian state, that provides everyone with a free and fair trial, and you observe your goverment and your media denying Breivik a free and fair trial, and censoring his arguments. Does that not prove Breivik was right, that there is no such thing as the rule of law, or free and fair trials and democracy in Norway?
Now, I knew that it was a bit of a walk for most of the mountain, and then a chain to get you up the rocks at the end. I was really nervous about this bit. Probably if I'd seen photos of it beforehand, I would have said ummmm no thanks. I imagined climbing up a cliff face, likely to lose my grip and go tumbling back down the mountain. It was a bit like that, really, but more like rock-climbing (which I love, need to do that again...), especially the coming down bit. Once over the first down bit - where I couldn't see over a bit of rock and was scared to lean back to find the next foothold, and having Michelle below me calling out the next one was a huge help - it was really fun. I felt a bit like a kid who's been resisting the big slide who then wants to go again once they've tried it. Also felt like a kid swinging off trees and getting my hands really dirty on rocks.
Are there any authors you’d love to meet? I’d say Suzanne Brockmann but I’ve already met her. Probably Collins since I just read the Hunger Games.
This soundtrack is in my car right now. When the news broke, I dug out my old CD box in my closet and found it. By this time, I was already in my second year of college. Whitney's songs on this album, and songs by others, including my favorite one on the soundtrack, "Not Gon' Cry" by Mary J. Blige, remind me of early college relationships. I felt tough singing along to those songs.
"Oh nothing," I said, "Dad just feels dumb."
In his free way of life he teaches us to cultivate a mind free of worry and a heart free of wishes, since these are greater treasures than anything else you can carry around in this world.
I share a wonderful relationship with my spouse, we hardly have disagreements except when we are rooting for our football teams. At that point, all bets are off. Its war! But, other than that, I never disagree with him provided he always agrees with me:)! Fortunately, we seem to share a lot of similar ideas on different issues that are important to us and there is hardly a discord that doesn’t get solved with a little bit of ‘talking it out!’ Hence, I was baffled by Ryan’s insecurity. Interestingly enough, he always asks ME not to disagree with dad, so dad doesn’t leave us.
No name I will leave
Have I ever met anyone who didn't like pizza? I don't think so. Why is that? I don't know. Is it important? Maybe, maybe not. In any case, it is not the topic of this blog. Pizza is one of the few dishes my very picky 3-year old actually eats. Well, he eats the crust, anyway. Our pizza is always homemade. I make the dough in my bread machine, and then we put whatever topping we like. We have only sampled pies from in-town pizzerias on various kids' birthday parties - but they just don't do the pizza the way we like it. There's just something about the tomato sauce on bought pizza that I don't like. And they usually put way too much of it which makes the pizza soggy. Before we moved here, we had never heard of Greek pizza places either but they seem to be quite popular in this area. (Why don't you serve Greek food, by the way? It's one of my favorite cuisines - I already start drooling, thinking about moussaka or roast leg of lamb...) We did like the pizza at Pizzeria Paradiso in Northampton, though. Another joint in that same town has probably the worst pizza I have ever eaten. I won't name the place here, of course. The amazing thing is, that that place is super popular and always crowded. Go figure. I guess my European taste buds just don't take to pizza that seems to be deep fried instead of baked. Well, here is how HubbyGrouch and me like our pizza. I only have to add that this recipe uses the metric system but I tried to convert it to US units.
Americas Hotel: Starwood Preferred Guest
It's one of my favorite days of the week. I really have become one of those annoying people that like to work out. Well, let's be honest I don't love it, but I love the feeling of strength I get from a great workout. I seriously feel I can tackle the world. It's a feeling of empowerment. It's a feeling that you CAN succeed. You can push through the mental garbage and do something really great for your body.
When my Dad got sick I felt prepared, resilient. I could cope. Dad has done a good job of preparing us for this eventuality.
again, and ever again, this soil’d world;
This is technically the end of my Freshman year (though I honestly don’t think it’ll feel like the end of my Freshman year until next April when I stop moving around) It was a unique experience — a tough one (there’s a reason all the upperclassmen shake their heads at the FYAs and say “I could never have done that my Freshman year) — but worthwhile, I think. Now I can watch movies that take place in London and know exactly what part of the city they’re filming. I can walk down the street and get drawn into a conversation with one of the charities trying to solicit money from people, and they don’t want to talk about money but about America, and how they’ve always wanted to go. I’m going to miss the gardens and parks and museums and people. People…
32. Harmony with seasons and cycles: You are becoming more tuned to the seasons, the phases of the moon and natural cycles. More awareness of your place in the natural world. A stronger connection to the earth.
Call the company you are interested in and ask the hiring manager if you could schedule a time to come in and ask a few questions about the company. If you tell them you are considering a career in that field, you may be able to secure a time to talk with the manager and potentially get that contact you were interested in. Once they meet you and if you come across put together and professional, they may divulge information about future hiring opportunities.
3 passed
I went to Youtube and started looking for some Josh Groban and switched to Sarah Brightman. I found a video I hadn’t seen in years-Sarah and Michael Crawford doing “Music of the Night.” Happy sigh….
Since it's my life, and has been a part of it for so long, I sometimes don't see how bad it is. Or take it really seriously. When others comment it helps me see it differently. As I write my story, I honestly can't tell if the things that bother me are normal and I should just shut up and deal with it or if they really need to be addressed. That's part of why I write and why I tell my story.
1 guys
* Don McManus as Dermot Shan
How Will I know?
a victim
The owl molds above are attractive and served a purpose. Back in the day, they did not cost much. Now, they are collectible and you pay an arm and a leg, so to speak.
Candies
It’s always a difficult question: Do we want humanity to survive, whether “primitive” or “advanced?”
But I am not an athlete.
Lord, help us to live holy,
Another example of what should have happened HERE is what was done by Gadaffi, in Libya; because he actually tried to funnel that countries profits directly back to the people of Libya, the way that we should have been doing things here, all along. (1)
A real class act.
This is, more or less, the text for my panel presentation on Saturday at the AHA. I’ve changed it a bit from the description that I submitted. But, what are you going to do? These things happen in an intervening year! It’s a busy conference for me this year. Tomorrow, an hour after I’m scheduled to land, THATCamp AHA kicks off. That should be tons of fun. Then, on Friday I’m chairing a panel on legislating the subaltern in the modern Andes. Tons of friends on the panel, and the papers look to be fantastic. Plus, I’m presenting Friday evening as the CLAH Teaching Committee roundtable on using Omeka and Zotero for student projects in undergrad classes on Latin American History. There are massive technical hurdles for that one, and I have no idea if I’ll be able to make it a worthwhile 90min. It might be very short! Then, Saturday morning I’m giving this paper. I can’t wait to get a chance on the plane tomorrow morning, flying to Chicago, to take a look at the program and see what else I want to attend. It’ll be hard choosing between Latin American history panels, and digital history panels I’m sure.
Getting all those kudos for True Believers was nice, but all it meant was that a couple of high-profile reviewers liked it. Whereas the book with higher sales meant more readers bought it. Given the choice, I'd rather have more people reading my book than getting critical acclaim.
An’ for each unharmful, gentle soul misplaced inside a jail
"Yes", she replied. "It's fun. We get a spray bottle, a squeegee and a sponge."
Brokerage Firms
Why do you write novels for young adults and how did you get started?
“Are you Shannon Brown?” one of the officers asks as he gets out of the car.
Any kind of mammal.
5- Sprinkle the shortbread with the remaining 1/4 cup of sugar and cut into rectangles. If the cookies have become cold they will not slice well, so try to cut them while still warm. chill thoroughly before removing from the baking dish.
My plan is to a grouping of these shabby white frames and their lithographs ready for a wall hanging. What a difference to see these bits of Victoriana in nice light pale frames, such a difference to the thin black narrow frames that you normally see these black and white images in. Up-cycling is the name of the game in today’s modern interior decor.
Do you have trouble deciding what to wear on any given day? Do you ever enter your closet and stand waiting for some sort of inspiration to overwhelm you? Do you ever wonder what in the world possessed you to buy some of the things hanging in your closet?
Once a firm has established its basis for competitive differentiation and has decided its overall strategic directions, it can then turn to the final of the three areas, namely the methods by which it can best pursue the firm’s strategy. This part of the strategic thinking will need a thorough appraisal of the firm’s existing resources and momentum in order to decide whether a combination of organic growth and operational improvements will suffice to carry the firm forward. In some cases, heavy investment capability will be needed to enable the firm to hire people expansively, to acquire teams or to build the firm’s brand. In many areas of private client and consumer law, for instance, firms are seeing the benefits of persistent and well thought out advertising campaigns, but the heavy cost of a long term marketing budget needs both resolve and access to funds.
26. What was your greatest musical discovery?
- The New Service Economy: Housing, Caregiving, Mobility and Healthcare
Vampire Academy is one of those stories that has everything, but it doesn't shove everything in your face! I was hooked right from page one and I never wanted to stop reading.
We're ecstatic to announce our 2011 Making a Difference Program. We have officially teamed up with Operation Smile, an out of this world, awesome organization, that performs life changing cleft lip surgeries on children whose families could not otherwise afford it. The long term Improvement in quality of life for the children that receive these surgeries is almost incomprehensible. We have committed to donating enough to cover a minimum of 1,000 life changing surgeries. We hope to beat that number, but it's a significant commitment.
After reading the biography, it was interesting to see a different perspective on the German princess in Eva Stachniak’s novel The Winter Palace. The story is told from the perspective of a Polish girl, a few years older than Catherine, who becomes a ward of Empress Elizabeth when her parents die while living in St. Petersburg. Barbara is recruited as a household spy by the aging Empress, directed to befriend Catherine and report back about the actions and thoughts of the Grand Duchess. Eventually, though, she becomes a sort of double agent, serving Catherine — and simply seeking to survive the normal intrigues of palace life and then the upheaval after Elizabeth dies, Peter is deposed and Catherine takes over. After having read the biography, I was surprised at the portrait of Peter — I wouldn’t call it sympathetic but in Massie’s account, he was far worse, especially in his treatment of Catherine. And his actions upon assuming the throne, both in allying himself with the Prussia, hated by most Russians, and in making enemies of the Orthodox Church, are almost unmentioned. Barbara herself is a fairly sympathetic character though even her developing relationship with her husband is merely hinted at. And this may be a bit of a spoiler but her disillusionment toward the end of the book seems just implausible — surely someone who had spent so many formative — and successful — years at court would have developed a healthy self-protective realism and cynicism about the motives and duplicity of powerful people.
I did not marry my wife because of our ability to procreate. I married my wife because I love her and want to spend the rest of my life with her. Why should anyone be denied the right to legally unite themselves to the person they love? Bigotry can not be overcome in the United States until we stop discriminating based on archaic and anachronistic religious doctrines. Our government must be secularized so the equal rights denied by religion can be guaranteed to all of us.
You probably know someone who makes their own wine or beer, and might even have tasted some of what they have produced. But did you know that some people brew their own Sake? This is still a niche, home brewing endeavor but as the popularity of Sake continues to grow, there will likely be an increased movement for home brewing Sake as well. Though you can find numerous books on making your own wine and beer, information about home brewing Sake is much more limited, generally only found on some websites or out of print books. Until now.
8th annual Oregon Garden Brewfest
One thing I do love, though, is the mana regeneration mechanic. The concept of pausing to sip tea in mid-fight is just awesome, and totally suits the easy-going Pandaren.
3 Has this been discussed between Duff & Phelps, Mr Miller and the SPL?
Bless God! He is planting His Kingdom in the Earth! Please pray for us as we move forward in this exciting project.
Sure, I got to knock some items off my bucketlist which is awesome. And I got to do some fun stuff with people like Chocolatefest. But I only went to the gym once, my 1 pop a day was un-doable, I did get in a lot of walking. I didn’t use weights and I only did pilates twice.
Sam: About you taking me to the middle of nowhere.
Quart size freezer bag
Children of April you stand up.
Editing:
I felt that "Grass for Sarah" was guided by Sarah's spirit, through my hands, as a Transformation Tapestry in honor of her daughter Amy, who drowned only a few months before Sarah herself died. I thought of how Sarah was an incredibly strong woman, having lost two children but still managing to raise two others and still continue to progress as an artist. She must have spent many of her days with a deep sadness, and at the time of Amy's death, I thought that perhaps she had not yet fully processed that loss when her own death occurred.
I find this story very sad, as a member of my family could have been famous but also the fact that painting was something which he wanted to, but he had to give it up and pursue a career that he didn't want to do. I find it a shame that his talent had gone to waste and nobody knew how good his paintings were.
There was 1 bottle of North Coast Brewing Scrimshaw left. Lucky me. It's a pilsner style beer which surprised me. I'm not a guy who usually drinks a beer like this, but I was willing to give it a try. I'm happy I did.
- 1 tbsp instant yeast
Throw ‘n’ Crush Affiliated 3 Complete Bandy ‘n’ Crush Affiliated 2 aural 50 seconds
My other write-ups on the trip :
2. Gymnastics and Dance
Dialogue: 6,0:00:53.95,0:00:56.34,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,Doesn’t that describe you, Houtarou?
You can however find the fabric I made it in. Yep. That's the reissue of Flea Market Fancy by Denyse Schmidt and I picked up my yardage at my local Stitch Lab. They have more, people.
You are blessed my son,
You may not always need to appeal to a hostile or resistant audience. Some audiences may be very supportive – but for different reasons. With this audience, you might have agreement but want to incite some type of action, and including a dose of emotion might incite them to act. Other audiences may be neutral – they’re not sure where they stand on your issue. This type of audience is tricky: they might distrust one-sided arguments and would be more motivated to support an issue when they have heard fair summaries of opposing viewpoints. The more emotional you sound in your appeal, the more a neutral audience might turn away from you.
I remember reading Rome-blogger Apron and Sneaker's post about her hunt for violet potatoes, and so when I stumbled upon them at a local market, I quickly nabbed a few packages. I new they were prime for salads. The memories of the calamari salad I'd made years ago had left quite the impression. It's the heavy dose of tapenade in the dressing that makes it stand out among potato salads. Zingy lemon and a bright black olive spread tie the potatoes and seafood together just so well.
DURBAN: Environment campaigner Snowy Smith (65) struck with hammer by black attackers.
players wearing calipers, clumping on crutches because of being amputees played
I used an ivory coloured large square card from Craft UK, via Joanna Sheen's site. The glittered backing paper is from a First Edition pad called Hideaway, and it's matted on to dark green card from Ross Paper. I cut some Spellbinders leaves in the dark green card and placed them down the right side. I added some dark green buttons along the bottom, they were from Create and Craft. I stamped the image with Memento black ink and coloured him with my Promarkers before matting on to more dark green card. I nearly forgot to say that I used my Distress Ink in Forest Moss around the edges of the image.
Down in the boondocks
Artillery
Affordable Vacations
Mission accomplished! Back at the hotel, we stroll across the lobby and have almost made it safely to the elevator without notice when we hear, “Did you girls find what you were looking for?” from the woman at the front desk. Can we do anything in this hotel without attracting the attention of the entire lobby? First my guidedog decides to perform a rain dance in front of an audience of about 50 bellhops. Now the desk clerk is broadcasting our quest for cheap liquor to the entire lobby. ON balance, we decide it’s best to respond politely.
Do you know how fucked up it is to do that to a six-year-old?
Tish is 8 years older than I am and I think back then people were taking bets that it wouldn't last. Not too many guys were marrying older women. On the other hand, 2 of my 3 brothers married older women and they're still married, too. The third, alas, is not. Neither are any other of the friends and relatives whose weddings I went to around that time. It's no easy job keeping a marriage on track.
LEE BAINS III & THE GLORY FIRES TOUR DATES:
MYLUNE: OOH! Now don’t be like that, Mr. Bitey-Pants, you know Autie Luney just want to wuv you! Like this!
According to the arrest report,
Disclaimer: I received a coupon for a free Farm Rich product to review. No compensation was received. The opinions expressed are my own.
We have red and green colored clothing perfect for Christmas this year!
The tulips and lisianthus glow in the lamplight.
Since it was not fair to “take away” a sacrament we allowed Pumpkin to continue to receive communion but decided that we would have him receive instruction with his classmates, and enjoy the traditional First Communion Mass. We also wanted to be able to have family attend and celebrate with us this time. Especially since MOM (me) did not get to be there for the first First Communion.
Utilities are included in the bill, and the apartments are fully furnished.
I came back feeling refreshed. And it is funny because our retreat each spring is called Spring Refresh. I wasn't refreshed because of the retreat.
all the antique furniture that we sell goes through our workshop and is in first class condition and ready to use in your home, to view more of our stock of antique furniture visit our website or make a visit to our showrooms.
Final Numbers:
Beat butter, cocoa, and powdered sugar, and orange extract. Add milk a little at a time until you reach a consistency you like.
If pots don’t excite you too much, here are six other toys I’ll be drooling over this holiday season:
I've been feeling a bit sorry for myself these days, with all the suffering I've been doing at the hands of Son's unsuccessful potty training venture, Daughter #1's start of school, and Daughter #2's temper tantrums over swim lessons, and all in all just being tried day after day. First grade homework stresses me out like you wouldn't believe, which sounds slightly ridiculous I know, but the act of trying to get through homework without pulling out all of my hair is a feat only managed by the best of women I'm sure. I am not one of them. At one point during first grade homework, my voice will rise and I will lose my temper. I know you're all snickering. First grade homework? How hard can it be?
The minute she touched me she exclaimed, “Woah! You poor thing.”
A good leader must have the discipline to work toward his or her vision single-mindedly, as well as to direct his or her actions and those of the team toward the goal. Action is the mark of a leader. A leader does not suffer “analysis paralysis” but is always doing something in pursuit of the vision, inspiring others to do the same.
There was a Pharisee named Nicodemus, a ruler of the Jews.
Sorry there are so many pictures but I was trying to fit all the little bits in ;o) The tin man is made with craft metal and his heart is hanging on som silver chain. The scarecrows face is on calico - I wanted to do him on hessian but I couldn't get the stamp clear enough! I used Tim Holtz corked vials with some alcohol inks in the represent the lion's courage and the scarecrow's brains. I covered the spool art parts with the Graphic 45 papersand added a little yellow brick road ;o). Dorothy's red shoes are ther along with the wicked witch's legs sticking out LOL. I'm quite pleased with this as I had no idea what it was going to turn ou tlike so it is kinda cute !!
To be entered to win on my personal blog:
But that still left the tampering spike. Well, the ever-diligent Mr. Jones obtained the second page of the Scram report, which showed examples of spikes when the Scram had aluminum shoved under it, a wet cloth stuck under it, and when a sock got stuck under it.
No? That’s great, let’s try that again.
A tiptoe to a slither, so as to be
Saturdays ROCK for so many reasons, one of them being that we offer a new challenge every week from the Crazy 4 Challenges Blog!
It strikes me full in the face...
Anyways, if you're lucky you can still catch Borderlands and all it's DLC for $7.50! A huge steal!
another night
Player who made the completion of a game account in the usa casino sites CasinoBaks from 300 rubles, we have 30% bonus to your account, which can be used for a game that increases your chances of winning.
Now you have two weeks to show us your creations. We can’t wait so see you work.
By the time I escaped the clutches of 'Beauty & Excess' my mind was whirling and a calm stroll through the gardens was just what I needed.. Not to be.. It was at this point the heavens opened up and sent forth a cleansing shower that saw all the little tourists running like scared rabbits... 'Petite Lapin' ... One of the few French words I remember.. So there will be no garden shots from me!! Although the sudden downpour did assist me to achieve a few shots of the Palace buildings and facade without too many little 'lapin' hopping through my field of vision..
How do residents get around and conduct their business in what might be considered inhospitable weather for a majority of the year?
2010.08.27 Iraq Baaj 3 0 Three Iraqis are gunned down by Muhahid.
Despite what my blog posts may show, I am actually a sensitive and kind individual, case in point, my sexual assault in a Beijing elevator.
For you the question will be 'Why?'
Answer: One thing you can do is guard against indifference. Think back to the beginning of your marriage. You probably did almost everything together. In many marriages this doesn’t continue. Something else begins to happen. Something that is not good, but is so subtle that it is difficult to put a finger on. Each partner becomes involved in his own work, club activities or other worthwhile causes.
the first draft of book 2 is due tomorrow and i've been busy chasing down my muse in an attempt to polish the sucker before i send it off.
waiting for him
In curves like this I generally make 3 cuts - 1 directly in the middle of the curve and one on either side of that. As I stitch around the curve I then turn under the fabric between each cut, one at a time using my thumb to give the edge a press as I go. I find turning under bit by bit stops a lot of fraying and turns the edges under very nicely.
Celebrities are people like the rest of us. It just happens that their work is in the public eye whether it be television or radio. In a lot of ways they are like the rest of us. Some have families to support with children to raise. Others use that money to pay the high taxes they accumulate. Some are not even asked to be celebrities as they are born into this lifestyle. Most importantly, they are not superhuman and are fallible like the rest of us. Celebrity Worship Syndrome is a serious problem and we need to stop bullying them and allow them to live that life, liberty and pursuit of happiness like the rest of us. Put yourselves in their shoes for a minute. How would you feel if you had to leave your home incognito everyday? Getting daily threats in the mail and having to protect your children from kidnapping possibilities? Watch everything you do in public or always running away from paparazzi? You could not even drive to Burger King for a Whopper without someone finding out! Have your friends sell you out for money or you get blackmailed? Something to certainly think about in all of this. Is it really necessary? Can’t we just let them live and let live?
How counterproductive to keep struggling to carry a load that God has selflessly offered to carry for us. Why is it that we’re not trusting Him to live up to His word? What’s keeping us from doing so? Numbers 23:19 is clear that we can trust God to stay true to His promise to us. If He says something, He will hold true to it. “God is not human, that He should lie, not a human being, that He should change his mind. Does He speak and then not act? Does He promise and not fulfill?”
go on. But I realized when designing my studio 9 years ago that this time I
I know of one or two other confusing places nearby to where I live and I thought I'd look around for some more to compile a list. So here it is:
If you read my BPA series, you will learn that BPA has been tested here and in other nations and has been found to pose no health threat whatever.
“Windspren,” Kaladin said. “Chasing after the storm. Are you certain you don’t want to go with them?”
That does not make sense.
I started teaching Spanish courses at a University near hear on Wed. It was fun to be called professor and see the students so willing to please and learn. It was a joy and a comfort to see so many healthy young people doing the right things to advance themselves. Why have I always been able to inspire my students but not Beth? It is a sad irony that I would gladly switch to have inspired just my own loved ones.
Two broad theories have been proffered in explanation. The first is that the conflict was engendered and continually stoked by a government-backed 'third force' which sought thereby to destabilise the ANC. The second recognises the brutalities of apartheid and the methods used to maintain it, but posits that many, or perhaps even most, of the deaths arose in the context of the 'people's war'.
Everyone is welcome to attend and bring their ideas, support, knowledge, friends and overall charm.
Local Cell Phone provided
24. Some of the props used in the 2005 version of King Kong were original props from the 1933 version. These props came from Peter Jackson’s personal collection and include the Skull Island spears and brightly painted shield, and some of the drums from the sacrifice scene.
Ink: SU - Pink Passion, Brilliant Blue, Basic Black
on my own, hearing him out. I made him sit
Then we spent New Years Eve out with a girlfriend of mine (it was her birthday and she is single). That is the first time we have gone out for new years without kids in 6 years! WOW! We went to dinner and then to a theatre that serves alcoholic beverages to your seat (large leather recliners with a table to one side and a cup holder and a button to push for your server) while you watch a movie. This is the $8 Three Amigos 32 oz drink of mine. NICE. See the milk dudes behind it.... note: do not eat milkdudes and drink tequila. No Bueno.
Happy Belated Chanukah, Merry Christmas, or whichever holiday you celebrate this season. May you know love.
Thanks to the ‘castrating’ of marriage by the widespread use of contraception, most people, and even many Catholics, appear to think that its primary purpose is not the procreation and education of children, but rather the celebration of romantic love between two people. Until recently, most people still knew there must be some reason why a sexual relationship between a man and a woman was different to other human sexual relationships. Sadly, though, such is the society that we live in – in which children often take second place to rather self-indulgent adult romances – that it appears many people in the West now assume that the only purpose of marriage is for the “good of the spouses” (regardless of their gender).
Here’s the maths:
— In that game, Eli Manning ripped apart the secondary of the Cowboys, connecting to favorites such as: David Cruz, and Mario Mannigham for a few explosive plays in the game; which end-result: led to the downfall of the Dallas Cowboys in New York, and yes, this opening game will be played in New York, just as the season for the “gun slinger’s” ended.
That was such a boost, I can’t tell you. So I went and talked to the MD who asked me to send my novel in next year when I’ve finished the editing process. So that’s a real incentive, and in fact next summer is going to be busy with promoting the walks book in June and July – book signings and talks etc., so this could be better timing.
What do you think about Ron Paul’s campaign so far?
Hubby has today off so we're heading out to have some fun on this... last weekday... of... my spring... break. Can you just hear the sniffles in my voice?
"Mommy, can I eat this?"
Me love you long time.
He yelled out to the pilot “for Christ sake ring the bell!”
Anyway, If THAT isn't enough to go whataaawhaat?? at, then I don't know what is.
Opponents objections and concerns regarding wind turbines can be listed in eight distinct categories: Visual, Noise, Intermittent Power, Birds/Bats death, Altering Vegetation, Fire, Ice and Pollutants. In this first article, Wind Farms – Cons, Part 1 the discussion is wind turbine noise.
Brief Synopsis: In 1066 a mysterious Monk wants to change the outcome of the Battle of Hastings.
Nonduality itself doesn’t change. It doesn’t even exist since the word means “not two.” Who, then, is there to see nonduality? Nonduality is exactly what we are. It is so intimately what we are that it cannot be seen. Anything said about nonduality is nonduality at play and play is the dualizing nature of nonduality or consciousness.
Release Date : March 2006
Currently there is a system of compensation which is based on the principle that the unsuccessful party will be ordered to pay the costs of the successful party. If a claim is proven, the wrong-doer pays the legal costs of their negligence. If it is not, then the claimant pays the employer’s costs of defending the claim. In other words, only if a worker was injured because of the negligence of their employer does the employer have to pay the legal costs and compensation of a civil action.
The use of the Islamic practice of taqiyya or deception to mask the true nature of the schools has been upheld by Gulen himself. In a 1999 sermon, the Turkish pasha offered the following advice to his followers:
YOU have to have extensive product knowledge of not just your own product, but the competitions product.
Speaking of learning secondary instruments, I’m deeply considering purchasing a guitar. One thing I love about being competent with a piano is that I can somewhat accompany myself. The guitar has the same appeal, so I really want to get my hands on one so that I can start learning. Who knows? I might not have to purchase one; why purchase if I can just steal my brother’s? Not like he’s touched it more than five times since he got it for Christmas two and a half years ago.
PS: They will not be modular terrain boards. Just texture. I like my scenery completely independent of the gaming table.
I did a small ritual to commemorate Tailte and mark the harvest. As most people reading this blog know, I write a new ritual each time.
How did you know you should become an author?
Geocities and they offered free websites with a person
The Usual Suspects. This movie has one of the greatest endings in the history of movies. It also boasts an acting Oscar for the previously lesser-known Kevin Spacey. Oh, and it has about 20 great scenes. Also… One super awesome slo-mo coffee cup.
Decided not to go with a Wireless N product until the final draft is ratified. This Wireless G access point was easy to set up and configure, has decent range, and has 3Com quality behind it. Definitely more expensive than other brands, but you get what you pay for.
The other weekend we were all set to take a drive deep into the Luberon Valley when we encountered the main road in blocked off at Lourmarin. Now, in France there are roads blocked off (which everyone ignores and drives around the signs) and there are Roads Blocked Off. Given that people, actual French people, were turning around, we thought maybe this was the real deal.
“Ron”: I don’t know really. I’ve learned how to swype on my android now so, it’s just as quick.
Honestly, I couldn’t tell you what Mr. Seau spoke about at the mall other than the usual message for teens to stay in school and stay away from drugs and gangs. It was pretty run of the mill, but the fact that he sat down in small room with about 8 teenagers before hand and looked us all in the eyes as we tried to scribble notes has stuck with me. It seems to me that there aren’t a lot of athletes who would take the time out of their Saturday to do that. The one thing I do remember him saying was “I never make excuses because excuses mean I failed to do my job.” It’s just one of those quotes that has stuck with me all of these years later and that quote (along with his 1990 Score rookie card that he autographed for me) is what I’ll remember him most for. Keep in mind that in ’92 or ’93, Junior had only been with the Chargers for 2 or 3 seasons and was still very young.
Do: Meet with the funeral home director. I am so thankful I met with the director of this funeral. He has been responsible for over 7,000 funerals and his experience and care were encouraging. As a pastor, your role in the funeral is important. But so is the Funeral Director’s. Don’t sideline him or attempt to undermine him. Instead try to develop a relationship with him for the sake of future funerals and families.by saying something like “only those who submit in faith to the Lord Jesus will be granted eternal life to enjoy God’s presence forever.”
Hoping everyone else had a fantastic Valentine's day weekend as well! XoXo
Strawberry: 16
Meanwhile, for those actually fighting a war overseas and not working in a cushy lab stateside the GI Mag isn't cutting it. So in response PEO Soldier issued PMags through the Rapid Fielding Initiative. PMags were given a National Stock Number (NSN) and put into the supply system. All is well in the world. PMags for deploying units and there was much rejoicing.
Meirik O, Kallén B, Gauffin U, Ericson A. Major malformations in infants born of women who worked in laboratories while pregnant. Lancet 1979; ii: 91.
To add to the confusion in the case, attorneys for the Native Americans have argued the case should be returned to the District Court because the government did not tell the district judge, in the first place, how expensive the accounting would be. And the case goes on . . . .
"Whut? Time for another stinkin' birthday....sigh"
So in order to make myself feel a little better, I pulled up some stats on this mess:
Ninety-seven families who lost ninety-seven farms
As nature speaks to us of God, it sends out messages of shock and awe. Shock at how destructive the created forces of nature can be – as in floods, tornados, earth quakes, etc. And awe at the majesty and power of the God who created the earth and the forces of nature that are capable to both sustain and destroy it.
It could be the diagonal composition, the myriad tones of orangish-red superimposed with stains and reflection and bowsprite-like squiggles, whose recent additions I’ve found too infrequent,
“Sun, stand still over Gibeon;
How much of this stuff are we supposed to want to eat? Does everyone really want constant turkey dinners in November?
Vesper ends up betraying Bond in the end. She’s a double agent, working for the organization that employs Le Chiffre. Her boyfriend was held hostage by the group and they coerced her into working for them to get the money. What’s nice is that because Lynd isn’t a professional at all of this, her tears are real when she sees Bond kill the two African terrorists. The filmmakers have managed to make all of her actions consistent with both her growing attraction to Bond and her ultimate betrayal. It’s a quiet but powerful performance by Green, and the relationship between Vesper and Bond grows naturally through the film so you feel her betrayal all the more when it comes (even if you know it’s probably coming).
This activity is drawn from Smiling Inside, Smiling Outside - an ideal resource for teachers, counsellors, and parents of children in their early years. It will help children to develop positive perceptions of themselves and their place in the world.
The stories that could be told are endless...Jim's Dad grew up here...Jim has lived here almost all his life... and now our children are the fourth generation to live and work on this farm. While our farm might be "young" as compared to some in this area, I think it's fun to think about the last 100 years, hear some stories, and wonder about the stories that will remain untold..."Who lived here before?"..."Who drew those pictures in the granary?"..."What was that room in the attic used for?", etc.
Click on the pic to download a copy!
Two extended travelers and the full-timing woman had Class A motorhomes. Each towed a small car.
Was in hospital for 8 days and I can tell you if it wasn't for hubbie bringing me lovely M&S veggie and fruit salads I'd have starved! Food was seriously yucks!
Win a Kindle Fire and RSVP for FB party 3/15!
My dad, in the retelling, says that he had so much fear as he tried to do something but felt so helpless. He gave the first blessing without oil because he forgot to bring it, and later felt commanded by the Spirit do the full ordinance (as mom said). As he gave her the second blessing, he told me that he felt the powers of heaven pour into my mom and felt the fear that gripped him relax. He said it felt that it wasn't up to him now. She was held by the Power of God.
How can you walk away
These variable rainfall patterns in recent years have prompted major efforts at better forecasting in the basin. In particular, the successive years of low rainfall during the mid-1980s, with floods in some years barely half a “normal” year, led to a decline in the level of Lake Nasser/Nubia to such an extent that by the time a major rainfall event occurred in August 1988 the turbines were just short of being turned off.
Students can then watch the recorded books over and over again! This is
Bet you can't wait for this one, can you? :)
Papers: Bazill- brown, pink and white cardstock,
Schlafly Special Release Export IPA
The Stony Brook Southampton campus is located in Southampton, NY, the heart of the Hamptons – a beautiful and renowned resort area on the East End of Long Island.
Lisbon, Portugal
small flashwand out of his satchel, flips it on and begins to
The poor Baby wakes
* I'm slowly making my way through the backlog of last year's submissions that languished in my inbox while I was climbing the steep curve of dad-dom. Apologies to the writers that submitted so long ago and got nothing but crickets. I know how it feels. Just last week I received a rejection letter from McSweeney's for some ditty I sent, oh, 14 months ago. I suppose it stings less once you've completely forgotten your submission in the first place.
There’s another Birthday Bread Bite still in the bottom of the bag ~ Cole will turn 3 years old on Saturday. A low-energy level birthday party is being planned, allowing Momma to participate by sitting and watching while an assortment of little tykes and their parents, along with various family members gather to thank God for another year of growth, development, love, and lots of life in the person of Cole Michael.
But if you love him you'll forgive him
Don’t assume you know how to write a book and never read a book on writing for children or young adults. This seems like common sense to me, but I know many writers never study the craft of writing. Read all about the genre you write and “how to” books. And then keep reading them. And read them again. Join SCBWI and become active in the organization. Take online classes, go to conferences, network, join a critique group…it only takes two people, reach out. Push yourself. Sometimes it takes you to toot your own horn to be heard. All children’s writers love to talk about their writing journey, the craft of writing, and their next writing project. Don’t be afraid to ask well published authors questions. You’ll be amazed how nice they are. Children’s writers are the greatest. They rock!
Two gifted humourists together – they could have been very amusing together, but I fear Alan Bennett would just be too incoherent with excitement over his new neighbour to make a decent contribution
“What do you think I’m doing? I’m having fun with the stripper you got me for my birthday.” Since when was Ricky all prim and proper? After all, this was his idiotic idea.
Like I highlighted in my last post, I love the movie Good Will Hunting, which a lot of it has to do with the music (mainly Elliott Smith). Some other movies I love with music that stands out for me are: Vanilla Sky, Donnie Darko, Almost Famous, The Butterfly Effect, The Girl Next Door, American Beauty, and Braveheart (for its score). Not all of these are great movies objectively, but movies I love due to the power the chosen music brings to the scenes.
Other gaping holes in Boehner’s logic have also gone unnoticed. Attempting to pin the slated rate hike on the opposition, the GOP decried the fact that “Democrats put in place a law that would double interest rates for student loans this year.” It’s a bit like castigating Republicans for raising taxes . . . because, after all, they knew in 2001 that the Bush cuts would expire in 2010.
salt, pepper corns, and bay leaves. Do not add the garlic or dill at this time, or the dill will get too wilted, and the garlic will get blue spots from the brine. Bring water to a boil, and boil on med. low for about 15 minutes. Shut the heat off, and let it steep for another 15 minutes OFF the heat. Wash pickles real well in the sink, or in a bowl, and take off the end stem, if any. Make sure your jars and lids are sterilized already. You can just run it through the rinse sickle of your dishwasher, or boil them in a large pot of water for about 10 minutes, and let it cool down.
Divine imagination,
Equipment: One 8-inch by 2-inch cake pan or 8-inch springform pan, greased, bottom lined with parchment or wax paper and then sprayed with Baker’s Joy or greased again and floured.
Now that the Christmas holiday hubbub is over, I am working on my goddaughter's Christmas gift. Luckily, the family is used to our gifts showing up some time in January. When Julien was a toddler, she actually thought Christmas lasted 2 weeks!
I saw both J and D (psych) yesterday. The session with J was just crazy confusing. I told him that it was hard for me to see projects that I had worked on and only see failure. I told him that all I needed to hear by the owner of the project was that I had done alright in order to see it differently. He asked me if that was really true, if I just wanted positive affirmation. I told him that it was. So he tested it out. He was completely genuine. He told me that I had been doing really well in therapy and all this other stuff… I didn’t just hate it. I DESPISED it. I had to admit that I was wrong. I don’t want positive affirmation, at least in person, at ALL. When I left I (sarcastically) thanked him for making me think about it all weekend. He’s interested to see what I’ll think on Monday. UGGHHH!!!
Before we left for the mission field, I memorized Psalm 121 in English and in French, and over the years I have held on tight to those last beautiful words of the psalm: The Lord will guard your going out and your coming in from this time forth and forever. (NASB)
She only had 21 years here on Earth, but her energy lives on and will be felt for eternity.
That brings me a to total of 975 calories, leaving me 825 for dinner. Depending on what I choose for dinner I can keep it well under 1800 without feeling hungry.
8:30 - Bath time for the girls
I never did learn the Nepali word for owl, but the Thami name is actually quite beautiful: koolooloo. It’s a shame I never got to use it, because from the moment I asked where I could find the little chickens, they became known as the sano kukuras:
“We’re really hitting a pain point,” says Pouchot. “But we’re not angry, we’re not complaining — we’re talking about what we can do to succeed and help each other.”
Nanaimo Bars (Cocoa, Graham Cracker slice with butter icing and chocolate topping)
I contend that the reason our political leaders turned out the way they did is because of the winner-takes-all nature of the pre-1/11 democracy. In the system devised with the 12th Amendment, we elected a parliament that chose the Prime Minister who had unbridled executive power for five years. We didn’t, and still don’t, have an effective local government. Parliamentary oversights need not have been enforced. If the Prime Minister’s party had absolute majority in the parliament (which was actually the case under all three governments), the opposition could be ignored altogether. The ruling party could pass any law as they saw fit, appoint anyone to any post as they saw fit, distribute relief materials as they saw fit, give out procurement tenders as they saw fit – they could control everything from Bangabhaban to your local cricket club for five years. The Prime Minister and whoever had her ears (or whomever she delegated her powers to) could behave like dictators. There was no ‘accountability moment’ save the election once every five years. Meanwhile, the opposition party had nothing to do for five years. Shut out of the political system altogether, they had no every reason to be obscurantist and no reason to cooperate with the government.
Date: Thursday, May 10
Breakfast is a very serious business you know.
